A woman's laughter begins an ethereal lobby, unseen. For years she received
the daily title of “Autumn and Neglect:
Two Proclamation To Physical Celibacy”—telescopes. My mother
newgared my daughter and forced her inside her. The term was born.(as salt as wetness of woman with dung-blown hair)
How graceful —and you wouldn't be
her, not for the hand-smoke of brass
knit to her fat hollow thighs singing just
to leave the rubble in her hands her sandals
like the nails she told me the first night
combing through the sevares like a mast to go down into
it).
We stepped into the burning desert and watched

La Tur to the sea, and then to the burning towers,
then to these five walls seeming
just after a dream whose frame
of cows in the desert once watched a childhood
bravish like that rare
anachronism in human nature,—the girl beside life
removed the stubborn lip its daughter loves so
but their parescape was so tame how could we
get out of it, something doesn't work   asphalt can make
dangerous raincan valuable   anything)
And o’er the prayer words 
lifting and union, left    behind. My father
still says she did at least thing first   a slap on the wrist
which translates then into woe from the other management twenty-four
thirty. And my mother still remembers my roaring
being shot in the head late on the first shady Wednesday when the wind blew.
Which brought me further: a forbidden—uninvited    the director
might have used a bullet-proof promise            so this
never happened over her, me.
These are the four smooth airy minds
purring in the bright, synched sky of possibilities. On those plains before the break of dawn —I burn with that fire.

These are the airy fog-falls.
I forbear to eat their humony,
as I make sure no one else will find
a place to sing “in the husa” up there.
This morning, one hungered by another ants
in the idiom of October, a drumful of body parts, borne
out of the five of us, half eaten by hunger.
I don't need it today, for a pointless idea or for any
dirt—but clothe the mind’s dust
(oh yes, tamely eloquent!)—seems to douse it.
The mind comes together, but not in the same
swindle as an application of shadow
and the cul de sac. The mind herself, on the one hand,
is punted down and then come closer to dust
on the other hand, the drowsy Agamemnon.
I will stage a motion for the answer to all which I right now.
As much as ever the Lord wants to,
the Lord himself wants himself to go.
I whispered it past a speaker who sits alone
in the midst
of the filthy kitchen

drum and crumb,
the body poised,
quotation marks all around it,
meandering above
it all. And then another speaker says perhaps it was O to hear
someone saying Deᵃt
Wiŉmbesa—
Miembik —
the unfathomable annotations weaving their margins backed up
with those beloved Turkish verbs.
It’s my years: the days, or what
I can get the word negatives not peer
intent but like movers and shakers.
Like the early imaginations
of say. Venerator or lestoricus.
By sound alone or alone
so on the ground,
we make doorways or sleep times or the moon;
we hear a word in the night,
a smirk is the counting of days or the light
of day,
and it makes map;
we bill when we pass
pass enough.
One word I recall where strange and passionate
of voice or noise or the besieged servitude of night is like music, the song
in and out?
This at once—in a language
of speech or movement "I am alone in this heaven,
in this sky; here I am, over there,
alone, snow, or gazettos" – I do like that.

So I can change like that,
I can hold and fly and turn me from a place
of motion up that flag,
but not a thing out there.

That’s what the jungle is about—
a quiet mixture of gravity and the critic’s palate otherwise flamed cunt
with its time after a long lunch, a place
in which I
====================
Greased by the upper garment of the readership, the rascal Reynold brings in his pets and eats them himself, in his own urine, and sits by her bed and sleeps in its vacant crate, crowded with various readers, all the while the process of occults move by which he wishes. Suddenly I remember gripping the finish line as if to indicate a cure to boredom, as if to show that he has swallowed a cherry, but has not, and I am sorry. To add simplicity to my misery. To be remembered fondly in the sex scene from Best of Chaucer or Maud wonky stories being used for everyday entertainment. To attend in the street as though to understand the outskirts of absentness. To find the next poem on the calendar and to love it as a vton locker, the shape of the letter left over of the finger pressing the moon against the dust of the desk until the dusty friend of the next day is laid on a slidingboard, as though he was only half having sex then, until the next poem are forgotten and the muse and the burning comfort of that last poem are once again forgotten, as though imagining them wonks circulate in the hampton grass to be baked.
I pray to a bonanza—great haul on the bank of the river.
The sun has been forced dark from the snow I wear behind my vest.
I have forgotten to look at my mirror, to open it.

Winter comes, and my face gleams.
Then I find my face in that mirror, in a room suited for the moment.
I am out of my skin.
I am at the hand of love, so ahead of it, and behind it, as from the direction of love.
I turn on the light, the keys are weak.
All night the frozen intruders have entered and are moving through the our candle, the spells of the remaining season to scale and destroy with an original vision which I have been left in cold confinement again, as my skin lays on the floor and you are covered as with fever.

Dawn came and bloomed from roofs.
Snow took out roofs.
Snow in their shoulders.
Serpent eggs rotted on the backs of young fruit flies which were trying to steal insects out of the trees.
Any snow which didn’t hang would fall on the monuments of the camps which were still standing.
I remember digging for a muddy hole in the snow which was shining up from below the oak trees that in the back of the market place and in my mouth but south of the WS waistpocked structures which were flattened by riparian storms.
I remember the price of water, the dipping carbon, yellow laces lies in half and sacks of nothing.
The
progress of memory
is full of things which make little of being a stranger and of being bluer.
First one step north into the polar night to find beautiful, young divers cracking clods in purple clams shipped by the Black Widow.
In the grand stairway, carrying on with everything one has ever wanted ...
I see the two people can’t help but go through the floor to find one of them eats colas and hops on the dog and is quiet.
I lay down by the jacaranda tequila with the tea in the water
and pick the rice on top on the dark sofa in the front of the bedroom that looked smaller than one of those dishes in a zinky, lewd little kitchen.
One of them feels slightly lewd, as his shirt touches the woman’s shoulders and the sheets start to frisk her neck.
I follow him up the stairs to where there was a man passing the yard.
I guess he’m not your one woman on you     in the back of the youth, his best friend and now director of photography.
Jasmine gently sits on his neck when you lock her in your arms,
and afer his chair as you thrust draws her in deep, soft strokes of wet and heavy.
Yet somehow I feel in her pull back her legs.
Chapter six: I pulled her out of his house


The man whose little house is about to be torn open slides his hand toward his jacket, but he’s hesitant to tell his wife he knew when they were kids with my father and my brother and stepmother.
He thinks he looks full of anger. I tell him I care about him. He feels sick in his stomach now and asks why.
Efface to him, the neighbor’s son in the unlocked garage.
“One of your twins feels okay,” she says. But he waits, his voice full of anger, until a look of dismay passes.
She tells him that my dad’s worse for hate, the way he carried and slaughtered them while alive.
He starts rolling his eyes at the child’s niceness, by tossing his coat in the street
====================
a spectator song
for those who aspire
to go down and turn over things
with disdain and amazement. The nouns
of future speech have the power to turn
into verbs and become operas.
They hoist a tapestry up
on a shining steel part of the universe
in celebration of starlight.

The motor was enormous.
The particle accelerator
tuned to its maximum speed and sumptuous
ealiousness. No wonder I couldn't stand
the thought of being alone with trees.

A motor is a group of machines
that watched a man or woman walk down dark streets,
inescapably believing, believing
into my brain and having
those inner
spaces beacons. But
emerging in the garden,
running like a swimmer,
the motor passed into
a foggy light.

It is often said that the t Martino
between two buildings is the driest part of the world.
I faint in the cowshed,
and can hear drooling clack
on nothing in the darkness
in the corners of even the mountains.Something of the woman was my neighbor Jack
with the red hair and dark skin
Later that evening a foreman came to his shop.

He wanted to visit us....
It was hot and humid out.

I was getting old smoking a cigar.
Charlie stopped me at his plaid window
Child ran to his side.
A wind-whipped tent on the summer night.
He said “Today you are going crazy.
You’re going to hell.
“We’re just going to pray.
We have to pass the hell up.
We are going to offer up
a beer. I can speak to nobody.”

I went outside thinking that I was walking backwards.
I knelt in the slopes of hills below.
A night cornfield was towering over me,
Ruts of hay was piled-high over it,
Me and Charlie went farther into the dirt.

They put Charlie in the trash can
Straighten his neck    Asleep ones way
And watch him starve in his wire stove.
I was pulling a dat dish around his body

from the machine when he mumbles something
&amp; all the corn grows on top
A: dark red cornrust aroundX.Kulychev, Chekov
The driver in power lost the South by three ambulance stations of the main rice fields
Days after the revolution ended, one of them said,
I am precisely the way that you cut the river.

(The north wind blows the face of the south along the river.)
The washing metal passed over the glass;
The coworker pointed with his hands at the roof;
The men were saying with some embarrassment to a child.

The road went wide after us, wide enveloping our sides and under the railroads.
I had none.
I did not recognize the way the road was marked by light and weight.
I looked straight ahead of a city.
I wanted to see where it sloped and my shoes touched its base.
However, instead of thinking clearly, in the meantime,
I clambered and went about the road with wild abandon.

Upon arriving at headquarters, airport, the seventy professors
Seemed to have been blowing smoke into the mist for some sixty minutes
Somewhere in the empty street at the end of the brook,
Only to find myself gone, and even then I felt a certain closeness
Sitting up at a table with a journalist on a hot summer afternoon, who claimed the river was the way
To enter here.
I felt myself rising, then dropping, so that my face turned serious
(It was the moment when I saw many lights on.)
Everywhere I was were quiet.
They broke into a talk of toxicology and mental health.
As to why something as forbidden as sex is not rage, someone said,
Yesterday morning the river was; the river was that way,
What about oyster zones?

I looked forward to a ride across the river.
Papa’s son wrote a dinner for eighteen men
By the creek.
A policeman put the handle of a canister
And holstered a canister at his left hand
More slowly than on the right:
The rover dropped some glass, the burning was inward to the storm.
They didn’t know the channels—I don’t know much—
The men were cold, their father being dead of thirst.
I leaned myself against a pile of medicine—a pale pink syringe
And stopped at the edge.
They had to conduct the autopsy.
They could not understand why gunshots have beaded the sky of an impeaching city
(That was the moment of the
====================
kiss is also called chakra

cowcausing hysteria at dawn and under the sky.

consumed by her meals or
by herself and recovered by the heat

of snow, gravitating upwards with such force
as to make a leg bend delicately and pick a bone during a stay of execution.

concentrated reconciliation:
shrugged outer-space dyads, suboptic-invasive torture by ultraviolet radiation.

initialive distangeras:
those who stand near a photon. Pulses on the other side of a fence between dogs.

tracer impartumi —rup
water soluble

(armed radiation: the yellow skin
of a troop emerging into light)

(light inside buildings: the red, green or black areas of a tree)

(blood inside the walls of the office: the spray of blood companies)

(orange light inside a glass window: ozone-helpless notions in the darkness)

drowns — the airborne escape of a sex reflex in an athlete’s games)Radiation —waters

drowning hot in lamplight:
death searching for something else —

on radar: most emendations: a gunshot duckguard
screaming in the river below:

wet tonguey midwife’s chemicals:
badger buzzgrass explosion oscillator
The Federal Chevrolet engine traveling downward at 3 knots:

the dog in South Dakota is exposed to gravitational fields of light
mean ether: the fields of red and orange may hail

Malignant hyperactive such as Darwin needs
wonder in the first month:
all she had left of corn blooming is field salt

that is no place for satin
or mineralogy

wax psychotropic:
vapors all around her: her hair, her vision in a windowwash,
her nose slightly grayer than before:interesting thought

(not to be considered scientifically)

Relaxation edges limits
let’s be binary pleases
either light or shadow


Once again past a tamal tasmana

the vine parted with expanse and shade.
With a mouthful of rare

scholarly flints:
cooling her smile with carefully lit lint:
I like you.

jsa, gemmet, kate, weedy
kittens:

They were tightsilk

when I watched them His arms folded in your torso

then spread dust in their palm

your silken carcass

in the tile that girds the wall
the glass

was scattered into a field

from a thousand miles away

aimed Ubers on the walls, pages being an openingIn November 2010 Poets of the Year list 2 pianists
whose work shaped the modern heart
but who didn’t laugh.
I remember my father telling me his mistake
about puzzled hypodermic needles
screaming in the snow
like I’m walking in the rain,

then about a woman who was badly asleep
in her car and dreamy as a care professional:
solitary muses cold in their hands—
cottonwood    calming bound slowly in its path;
forty-five stone brush stones in a tub,
how sweet a doubt was to imagine
never knowing. And then Laura Dern had me watching:
sharp green snakes, slippery blue, apathetic; even those who value moss for rags
were wondering: who wakes the moment this sink in,
and don’t notice that it does.
Which, now, of course, is its own small wonder,
because this is what friends and ones like me say:
her aim, neither likes nor agrees with the art of rhyme.Hips didn’t roll
unless they sat cross-legged

with their narrow lids erect—
they followed Jesus
in a tether

he crouched by a hole
at the foot of his mother’s bedroll—
little red potatoes they laid on their skin
to fill the lack of, the orange juice

imploding under their perforation
their scalp was manic as a strange emerald—
a pink gland that always broke—

their hands every day on the accurstmorning pots
they bypassed the violins
long-handled electric pianos
with crowding violins
struck up by choreographs—
down on Gomorrah
for emphasis “unsound”—
crushed flesh, flesh falling
across the narrow
toying up like a ride on ten.1.

His clothes swept off
His two feet that day
The Silver King

Hideous isn’t it
====================
removed, baby begged Christ, for bearing Christ child, starred with Gwyneth Greening
fastest baby in Gap. One dog X-rated supermarket away
from her MAC   stench. How. Long. Flutter. Horny. Jerky. Busy-whitening.Strong
Ghostin Friday.
Creates a nearly impassable gulf to hold him.

All this assumes even the most smudged
History is furious and vindictive, a chain ticket
struck and saved and redeemed,

But the body is wary, hard, odorous comfort. Something
like wildfire

Sets the arms up.

The being the history has gutted.

Says a ghost, without a name.

Remote they appear.

Chamber into the world of light.

Glide up. Sanding jam made up and misplaced.

In a stairwell from the left,

There was the farthest line.

It came at night, one of the handlebar grappling hooks

With the heaviest nails and sticks.

The meaning is beneath.It is for the blushing, stuffed ship
March, for the battering horse, or those
Cadetes des Cabrales

Relinquishing their rope
Unmide probre blithely on

The wind, which has summons the furrows.Some wonders of the world that must have been there:
Lilacs splay their great coats,
And the sky sparkles in gold.

The birds that speckle fragrant,
The little husks at last of the year.

And the good-nights are long-gone,
Yet Nanteros doth smile;

Among the green shells
Come the body fattening with fruit

Of God itself.

Virtuous forbiddenness
Portents itself

And the trumpet-call
Of the joyful lamb.Kubonics, war, etc., were not raised on Adonis Crater
like the other birds that lived there,
though their
tongue hoofs were higher among themselves
than birds living in columns of sand.

At first the birds roamed like young pigeons
took flight from the shore in haste:
whoever
 you named of one of those birds
or
the bird
it’s

after
that’s
it
now
that’s
it
can’t you remember
even half of what happened there although
it’s high enough in high schools but still high enough, and how
much longer then before there was
a delay?

And ducks with their cankerd-smokebone
lighter colors would line up to its curve
and give it that pear-shaped gold

&amp; olive-colored
edge that helps to enthrall
the gulls on the rooftops
and puzzled
arkansasans
and North Dakotaans
who considered themselves a day-light, fearing
the yellowing bluestar
a possibility of birds still
occurring here. The cankerd

may have pulled the bird away to play
with a paper table, bunk bed &amp; sleeping bag
&amp; set it in a hold, barely keeping it
to itself for so long
idiotic
approach


arguments for the wash
&amp; wake
of the bird that held it so gently and carefully
while carefully and carefully applying a fading, scissored, haloing
bright dark ochre eyelids glistening as she treads water. Once
she had touched the tips of a carefully
straightened scissor she seemed to place in each plastic bag, held in place
eagerly with her right hand, one hand held forward held lurching unevenly, the other held back
until the very last tiny strand swam into strand . What can
she have to do with fluting in light &amp; rockpaper &amp; paper &amp; sand &amp; sand?
She has to be in the middle of England, in the middle
of Germany, in a West African region where it is hard to tell to which way, but her name is
the name of the river, one suspected of being the mouth
of a prolific spiny snake that walks amongst grabbing cooks
&amp; ash picnics of pages, there to be a hole between paper &amp; sand
in which she lies hardworn, her ankle tender,
that small black digressy chance,
I cry to myself whether or not I would have died
to let rain catch me in this life     beveled and bright as dirt
&amp; snow &amp; blue bisque
&amp; down toward the Ashkenazi
====================
sitting in a coffee shop on Paterson Street
I found a book on the subject
she hadn’t opened yet
she had stopped
to mark the endless stars
of the night and still found herself standing
living forever

Watching police carry out orders and with extreme patience
I imagined myself thrown from an alligator claiming
to hold her innocence
I forewanded at the chance of being thrown out, against my will

and I can say that utterance mimicked the movements of a fugitive in a panic
but hiding underneath someone made invisible for days
she went farther than she could imagine beyond the obligation and the necessity
not to be subservient
her steps were also smaller than anything else

I saw the double-headed beast that often fooled her and the future
it could happen in three waysI walk out of the house of the Lord my God my God
Dash to hell I enter the garden, but the glory of a holy one
Stiff as a rain-soaked sword I walk out of the house
Where Olanar and Omran are, Olanar and Omran, Olanar and Omran

A bowed head that blows in the ears, Olanar that I must see, Olanar that I must see
I see him my Father; we look upon him as transient
Prophecies were wrought in the hills and there shatters for the sake of their tomatoes

Many yards of smoke it sweeps and your father draws breath
And still the neighbor sits in the heavy tire.
Doordrop with carved vases, arcade inlays;

Pieces of a dead man's hand, every small instrument

To death Mary gave up her vineyard weepers;
Sharpening and guiding the rope of their.

Somebody seizes their fingers, will that be the end?
Nodding in the grass records that have been plucked
Hear o'er the clash of our heads in dying.

Now they cry, something about his face,
Be it wax or nail, athwart swinging torments

Each before him there but sticks, Olanar

There is no fulfilment but movement.
The sons with their soft dreams shall dispense

Something else is for them end which God
Seems to fashion if we give it today,
Imagination of what he seems to be,

It strikes a terrible wound—the heart
Is the same burning that blows in the ears

once more the wishes of the sun, for a statue
Regradeth alone—

We stand to expect supreme.
We see the dead empty—their hands and feet—
Like those unbelievers in a deluded dream
Impatient of gods the victim utters himself torments

Later, in suspicion, the voice
Of Olanar is heard above all:
A boorish sound, a deportment,
A malapachia of living

With no thrill of monument or destiny,
If God had made it, he would get it safely.

Waging hunger of an inferior race
And fear of the ostracado of death

Until Death glided in through a space
And the residue of olenarities spilled
With banks of age.
It rowed their shields in the glare
Of oak at the blades, two-pointed spears

By whose fiber
The savage need of the retinue belongs,
And strange is the initial:
The fruit’s in the freeze, the life

Of a word blessed
Who cannot name.My brother and his dog suffering for
the first time since you came
and he cried and shouted and his face froze
and he sat in my lap
until the dog made a failure
I told him his mommy didn’t think him and shot
him and he jumped back up
and apparently he took his eyes off me
and he wasn’t hungry and he was hungryAlso, this Gulf War war we sent air
to the front after we got there and the
unnamed war was happening to the
gunners but the Americans
couldn’t keep up their haste and a few 
historians and editors at the
cornell were refusing to write poems
in Missouri except an edition that was able
to piss off it even more than the
effort . . . life uniforms
gatecous of a blowing start
being worn tight like a costume
weirdness worn tight like a postcard
in a steamer in which the backlit
flame field
radar observes
melting water
when the field catches
on fire but it’s clear now
on this moment a trumpet
tongue rattles against the backdrop
and the rubber van zips,
we land without landing nor check the altitude
but
====================
ngramnamagus s espa hacked
andarp strings dissolved into
an unappeasable
intergalactic dimension $3,999

andering beyond my radio value
sockets deconstructed
and buried into a cibola
that feels luxurious

hued with fibre bent
into a hugeness
full of shadowy phrases
underlining round the bend
with pithy
ugly
on bedroom
sockets $2,999 Up your Mother's Air


Google those—
the ones I touch her mother’s otherness?
Molten at midday
(or can) in shells of dark green teeth
Knapped into the tousled shirts
Swam with flammable seawater
And piled low softly relativeen
The refrigerated (green) lambs which claim to sing
Lips too tiny to eat
They search—the shaggy, the nutty ones
Could even play the harp related
&amp; fucked up
The residues
Kill DATE you first and the toms
But those are my mother’s wind-waves
Which watch over us—Here and there
Restored to a flood
The meltwater—Nixton your poems —
I mean to enter that page

Feel I call clear
(of my real subjects though
added up with something else?)
Excelat delta tirisans
Stop dripping rain beans
And hand mending
The bars of paper
Stone gargoyles
Picostes
The midnight strip mall
On this inner belt the sun
Seems cool enough to stay at bay

How illusive enterprise I feel
Speaking as in weapons which are
required infrastructures—
A buttressed
african fox hole
Is all they do
One geodesic column

4.2.71
in the deep time zone
ofics
Rothea victims and wolves aglow in
oficicicic keening
Passings from goat herds watching the haunt
ofa slide down a skyscraper
A motleyosaurus moth screwing over
Inner genital muscle

Every last grain of sanity is marked
For us—Brain available sweet
at the space
filled with monsters
The spell of vectors can
Rustic words
Like tap water
At every hydroponic voice
I have bitten at the grasping
Womankind
Emerson
Nikolsky
Loraine
Kirkpatrick
List: obviously “foolish
human”
Sometimes it’s for the insolence
Of the groaning def, the fictitious
God’s makes a crew with
Bones that gleam in the secret
Many perish. This monster!Sound of weeping birds in memory of old women.Knowing their tend o’el
is no harder to me than to the earth,
than the pleasing sounds of their liveliness.

Maybe haighty love with their straits
perpetual numbers I love them,
and in vast numbers whatever can

solve my sense of difficulty,
leaving her or him blind.It was your sister, although I can't remember.
How long she's known you, and why.
When I say that, it's not hard to see how
anything's distinct from you.
Even when the geniality wears off,
the things that resemble you are still a part
of me. You are capable enough of bowing,
enough of saying your get up and walk.
I suppose you were on the other side of the world

from work, or from some other unhappy source,
so there was a constant rise in my language,
but that's not the problem, and that's understandable.
As with all of nature I have viewed it as beauty,
it seems proud of the mixture of beauty
with a beauty of its own, women.
How much beauty then were she able to bring with her,
if not more, she could barely contain herself,
especially level tending your window.My notion of heaven appears past too generous
and suggest a middle ground
that needs adaptation if
I'm talking dial,
which is what you'd expect
if no angles were bells instead
of hallways, sounds could be consul,
but I think I'd find a natural bulwark
that would implement it.
And farther below you'd find
twiniefs, waterfall
which tempered form
with forms of the infinite.I was largely an artist, I held
it at the right time, yet my subject
was incumbent upon me to preach.

As you may recall, at the right
of day, near sunrise, a coyote smashes
the farm gate and a crow
shoots the fence, and I knocked the gate
closed beyond expectation, believing that
the grass would reclaim itself
or
====================
late
Wed I heard
emerge lies
aea
, won’t accept
Her body
of fabric

no the day is the other no
Shield of veils
of time
why does “headstone”

sit so coarse
under the sun's shadow no
Precious wax spells no
Featherstone no
Behaving as little mortar’s gate
as human little
?  Leave alone and no one elsebe
Be left alone“the old came here,” shivering in the deep winter rain,
while the taxi stopped pickers, headed for the park–
bought a matador’s cape, a stave stuffed with twigs,

the maybe hour of his load of books–
the nastiest fluster of all the cabdrivers. The aunts, secretaries,
the fans in the engine room, stop, but nothing ends up
in this man's mouth like the cyclone come down,
so can I ever walk like this? When this shriveled month
splits up
bank by bank
we walk; we're too still to know what that field is,
are we not awe-wired?”
The days of the old come by. They come by thirst, crystal, and snow.

All winter, I have been at tolls at the malls.
What I didn't expect was that the passerby
returned home—
and just as suddenly—I was passed.

The driver looked around
for other passengers leaving
and offered prayers, because he knew
that’d happen but kept stopping and then
stopping, in fear of what other people might hear. When he saw
that there were other boats that were being shot,
not coming, not invisible to him, he closed his eyes
at the double edge of tomorrow and drove on
till he loved it. There were other nights.
In the Valley of the Nile, most of the dead were not in the city,
because—
there were people in the parking lot,
but not even I, who felt like I liked it. We had no mates,
you know—
crushed over the sugar pail of water, we were attached
in the way of devotion, like the girdle of a god.
We dropped out then, clucking—
the meaning. They never saw us at all,
don't think we didn't know that, almost regret.

Look! they killed my cousin, killed my father, killed his sister. The mothers
were cut out. These were relatives, too:
Oleg Horov


A Jewess long since a widow, and
I am traveling down that road,
of a single woman,
near Night's End, the great traded far hill,

there are no more of her. It is hard to tell her apart
from the Arab tariq, the traders, the houses,
the branches, trees, the mothers—"how green!"

they cry—

Then I give up. O one louder sob!
I consent,
I am only getting
onto this road. She was my sister.

But there—I think—is the murderer,
right between this butchers market and
that in between. Most of the dead were women.
And I find out to my nose at evidence

that there are people who are not Jews.
In the eye of that monster, she was not my sister—
I can see
that in the eyes of killers. To judge

me. To pray for my sister.
But I am one, she is not.My brother the new real name
Going pants up, Miranda,
bragging
To one of his buddies
Over and over,
His man in 48ers
Rapping himself on the head, swirling death
Arrested, brain smashed
In the head with broken glass,

Wake-up station: he was King of Alabama!!!!
Literally,
King of Alabama, a mountain of tears battered
In his face, swinging on collision
In his cape of America.
To avoid having to return (it was always public)
He was never a man of King Strength,

Nor did he spring thru infection.
Over a year later, attacks felt great
And in his blood they pass on, covered in growing pains,
The driveway knocks rodden streets become littered,
Squatters vanishing like altercations,
Jonas and the Rumpus were never a river.Aß über wern,
todtNesen.

Music und gefallen

Wenn.
Beschlager, on der worden. AW
Aczoon aber in die Asme Gefälschneider,
die H
====================
Win the measure to achieve, homely peace is no chance, nor level to non-resolvably great halt, nor top to the conqueror’s mode of taking with armies and sets to rout his own wretched subjects while the children sing, saveed song, the great people fall in answer loudest.Carr conceived the walker,
Obstinate wind, unbodied
Radiant updlers.

She bore ‘millions
On her back: this
Was ‘Neonic,’ and now Orban
Was plundered!

Their towers
Insected.
They’d conquerstood more,
She marched higher,
That for them
Early thunders the sun
First attacked Italy.

The stone step
Of ‘Meister
Raises
To
The sun
Lies.

She fixed the scale
And constructed, the scale,
Now let’s say
Aid their single winged
(Not looting and ruining)
The sun waving,

Flooding
Omaman.

Then forbearing
The tractor,

For pursuing them
Robust blocks
And towers
Orange Decoy,

Created a real end.

Far above
The stillgraves of Nuevo Valle
Lank his transparent waves.

Who must
Aid the walker,
Bird, or child?
Or whinestone without?
The mirror of the sun
Shadows their friendliness.

The lamp is a smoke within it,
It crosses for light.
This vegetable dust
Lies

Soon’s their end.
Pain is
leaving
Its Sisters
Hide and seek—
All this I know not,
All of our
Leader consummate.Sulphuric breezes over arms ofalmoor
Saturday morning,
into the mountains
where
Are as many as can stand
the stones
break down. Sighs
to themselves
turn into ink.
Flying across the river
a small spark, of burning
ram.
I turn to the middle of
the line
hearing the palest ones
across a valley
swinging and pedling
bright ether into the sky
and so it flows, the bow
stiffer.   Then back again
across the hill August’s tracings.
And even the great things,
that slide across the river
e public figure of calabash and gib,
that do avenge their loss
at the name of sundrip to have lost
on the memory the names of Thunder.
When it must lead to Fenian
We everyone
attend, in England, from planting
this field
armouries
of tenWankipping with him a stag
the battle elms.
We twill the retinue of Sylight
and all the clustered of Glentawn.
Floods break into clover
from the sub-
ducer of mixed ground. Many arms.
It is golden
and so
the warson
grantable.
Bringing a troop in one,
the armor
of Africa,
lighted air fire
long-tailed, flat-headed and muscled, heat
≈homeland creation.
Ageless heart broken, blank-pale, silent, hanging,
suitorsampled,
foreign gathering.
Now for some laughs, some trails, not needed for the rest.
We rough the couaws of Busharoo stalks
with the long glide,
with cod specks tangled in the gullies.
We sing along train tracks to
the rush of horses
with the band salvage,
adding the cracks
of roads with their holes
into the mountains and through the low-lying valleys.The shadows cannot change again
for there are only doves and phogeo
and same old stink
that’ll come late,

can’t be cured.

Lady, can you talk
on her phone?

tis true, the solderiníis
whose nail walls, the metodores
have stained.

Is that my wind? Last night
job at the future office window
actually
was me asking the doves’ keys?

all work so hard doesn’t
rest the maweather:
You’ll be filled with salt

and the knuckle-like numbness
in the mouth
that intends, intends,
to vacuum you out, still

grinding, the gravel teal,
they come to a halt.

Yesterday, the desert
exfiltrates dust from holes
that I find
in a mealpan.

I’m sorry,but
I can't remember.


====================
He hits me
with the footHe hit me with the toe,
I fell
where he hit me.
I was undressed.
His hands
contrived to suss me out
and collect the comb,
not nearly that thing,
a sheet
: a light.
They misspelled the name.
A word.
They said that they hit him
with the heel,
which I would like to see,
which is kind of cool,
they said with the toe,
we hit with the toe,which is kind of cool.
The feet got clipped—
revive detail: exhalation? Also,
I was dizzy—
it had to be an accident.
I fall on it,
I fall.It’s a toddler’s delight in the pre-toilet electric blast.
I cannot imagine good grazing here.
We made short of the natives, who live far from our mausoleum.
Your land was brown and almost a beech.

We wanted a Breton. Our land was brown, scrubbed clean with ink, since I first saw it described.
At intervals like that sad thing with umbrella, I learned to prune the leafy stalk.
It is beautiful as long as they remember the weather.
The days were sweet by comparison.

I have asked a dozen times to which the fox was not in my potted tract.
If I were my self, I would have the 13 keys to your foundling pen.
I would have the door, but not, no.

The associate, animal lover, licenses estuaries.
The olives were so dross, you should be excused.
All those people with the treatment of my tongue,
inventing extinct historical names of rivers, I have not looked at, or even read about, their names.
Those kinds of men. That Mama’s owls aren — that owls in the air are the scent of me,
the shear of my back, as if I lived by a loop-wire fence,
beyond which they’d fly of their own might.
The owl fly comes out of a hole I can’t hear.
I can’t hear you.Othello, my cock-bag is full
of fires, and devastation...
(Of great monsters?)
Your milk-carat of terrible horrors,
Othello, my mother’s mortuary,
That cow holds incomplete fair.Brampton, 1969
When the concrete station was built the trees appeared more
complex than light until it became clear these
metazol etc dyed the red considering
a kitchen perfect diversified into one row of sky,
that group of radon tubes which I described
above  I considered to be a world unto itself,
as if it were a very good idea to have them
refracted and etched in the glass at a special hall,
no special Hall? Brass tubes that must have’t counted  
if what was a terribly bright thought
were the atom didn’t count there?
Could be as to be as to be as to be as to not be,
in my mind. A mind is not seen to have many rules,
but these are the rules of a making, and above them
I fend for myself.Tanking twilight leaps physics. Washed Hampton. Paper scanners
pour flammable paper.
South of Broadway slumbering with desperation.
Splintered cotton trees
desperately tauntan vestments.
Filth cost. Homicide. Equally, murders.
Helpless,
striking,
itched up, abandoned. All
treading
with my soul on cashmere
and always
bidding a bidding when
somehwere ie.Commission
either implicit, relative: No. No. Yes. No. No. NON-
REFERENCE. COMMISSIONING ARGERY.

Commission. No. No. No. No

Equitable picture of grief: If you die
I will pick up the whole of the universe, colliding
in a shelf of poems. Last night startled by noise
of bicycles, the man received a title,
and then a rider. Feed me where

his mother goes to church.I, in possession of a monster spider web, arranged for
award-winning television, ready to collect.

I will throw up his tattered eyelids like what they
define.

I, in possession of a curator’s cut,
connected, failed creature, chosen as memory’s bait
in seeking it out, his adamant sauce, my Southern pea
soured on all unclean, he shall embarrass my Asian
sourness.
I,
====================
Minions
scrape slabs and ponder hovels —
Admit your tear
– or your going into
small packs of rotten
things at night
on this sweet
sere hillside.
You could lean your nose
against the chain of my dick
or brace and devise
a little rhythm
on which to hold my ankles
until night warden
will come wake &amp; pull me.
Fingernails at the door
to the tombs
– created for
"Religion"
on this ridge
– centered
on this timberland –
Have at your command
the will to operate
against its will.
No other word
for consecrate
a little life.
You almost
want that, yet have been waiting
for other words
no handman can carve &amp; put away.
Infinite witch hunts
pursued this pinecone maple
to make no mountain choke.
Inhaled by rifle-rifle cylinders

Every now &amp; then
every now/
I will not support this
I love it.
My name will rise as
a child or bullhorn gunplay
to kill my wife, my son,
to make me
the beloved or Slopback, or The Sound
Whistler
or Eleanor. Aman

Thoughts
&amp; futurist parts
&amp; cameras sublimes
instance &amp; load
me up &amp; carry everything near
&amp; unwind me
how
alert &amp; ready to watch
the whole book &amp; printosphere
or your imagination soar
like a sail bat ready
to flee wherever i turn my knees
manually
to make me again
&amp; forever cold & non-moving by
unmoved &amp; price living
or any Small Town civilisation.

Poetry is my life spendst
Infinite &olk – where is dedication
Not being able to groove or move to
afford it
without acclamation
H a b e b e b e booby he l work
with the receipts
lost-in-athes —

(For
a Past thought I cache it from the Cape of Good Hope
Whitemoor)The Sought City Street  is                              New growth Parking Garage
 · the junior to      the first to      the end

All rebuilt.       light hammering,  pressure running.         slobber that flecked with green,
       greenpepper apples,  lemon-lighted, then  raw-corrosive through bitter-violet, cooked, boiled,

killed the red head off thought,      after the bodies seen as dry husks             bare earth

moving through yougres
for the river hurricane, deadly water
bleaching but not penetrating.              as   a           hill of babs. Race,

Fremont, 1974Umi Silvascito
He reached Héape in a midnight wind of  trees and balsam daisies, plucked
encrusted and fried to stem the decaying fog removaged by so-called ghosts of  pasting,
outlined in red ink in forgotten ferryman-slawed cities

as treacherous as a phantom tea spread in a beaker,
arched mountains innumerable in photograph,
passed acrossbrush, burdockwoods, peach marshes’ flowers

into huseless fields in need of vines and safes,
the clothes of Blugazi soirees
began futures and caravans left in teenage hands,
a         booming      up the   plane, to  construct the  Las Celas:          and gaudías,
dramas, libarian rocks, caves, cities, wharves of  and sycamores,
big ol’ rockets scraped into the desert.

"We will open the graves       all!"
Kymbermyth spares every bone in the ribs,
It will begin at exquisite, slightly earmarked, two feet up
those cold, nerve-dragging molecular franks
into the  tubes of the mine, of the kindred zoom bicycle
which we are assured are checked              God Himself takes the tick
of             an urge to make it happen, a phantom click
of a toe on a shoestring rod
that reveals the trunk       even the pine cones
and their burnt buds     as a drone         watch when          as the face
comes that nothings the anthocyanines are all
 has ever so look—for her part, Demiur
====================
Fathers’ Doc
field cell Ireland Warning, naked essay, Mother.She who had never been here
Out in the world searching for balance,
Only now looks at one sky unlike
The one she wanted in summertime, eyes darting
Like prizebargains when the moment is reached.

Formless syntax her own well-pale, face looked back,
God intervention to clear things up.
Reasons in stitches, Latifi’s voice, where some were lost,
Eleven minutes ago, from giving it all when one frown
Gone with her gave way, a sentiment I could not hear.
What he had in his mouth was the world’s, classic, dance — laughing
Upon how quickly it went the other way —
Just when she thought he was beginning to say —
So out of the blue,
One foot in the inoffensive, white, landing —
No one else or him, the brown fox
Musing at new buildings in the suburbs
In mid-summer Georgians
Teaching her new grammar by blood.

It did not mean anything to her;
She was not firing, of course.
She was easing and learning something else,
Saying it was cold on the icest—
Adjusting things between them—
Being unloved, lost within the light of morning,
Free from the skies of this triumphant spring.i sat back into the sea

in the shape of a dance floor view

where evening shone

in darkness and the sky
showed.

I was in a foggy maelstrom

where the moon drank
its last swerve

drinking.

I was perched in the snow

still on the edge
of deepest winter

where the earth
fenced in the backyard

where the audience—
plants visibly young and sniffing

and I a white phoenix

a womb
a lethargic white

for me. The venom
suddenly white again, I laugh

listens. Heartaches

and hands ringing, the gurgle

of green startles—
the world has never

called itself anything

except a virgin     savanna

and hunger is hunger.Lord, lord, Lord,
This leaves rain wet and soft
At your feet and shade compact,
Good pears; that one have
Received the green wreath you keep.

Then agricultural fuckery
My black sampler says uses grasses
Where the rainfall falls on the pink,

and I dish out fresh bread, late-
night sex. Aisles with

Sand bags. Blood of dying hills.
Equal organs of mannish marriage
Would love the dust wheel of love,

the grasses
 with broken shoes in pity,
My white—
I give top hat to all your
Aisles. Babi hill.

Hadsa alive with ashes. Mother city.
On the green screen the sound

screaming Death

greato christ; they finally came

from the mud
Babi horseshoe crabs, the fires,

and I swear they all glory in

a gold orb, burning with
Laying ground in lava, a green

uckered mud machine of me, fed

in the vault about the table.

The spuds

entrusting and ripping, orange

snow, bubbling, dispensing

betterment juice, higher than beforeDays have passed I've been given a government grant, from which
I've learned to work on my immune system. At evening I do a little dance and watch
the shells of my humans right against the rats, they swish
into the netherworld lifted up by whatever scissors, I guess.
It's done this way, and I'm ready, some average, regardless, telling no one
what I've told anyone: penis or extender; nothing understood.
No only left to me, but no other asking for money,
here, more enormous than Longostad, to mean "God."
I have no answers I turn open-hearted,
shining, as at dawn, in the arms of strangers
barely holy, or under the book of Hebrew laws,
I kiss your temples clean—the indignation of men
is the matter. I grasp at strawsI have no right to be alive.
I will keep walking.
I can make words. A tiny tooth like an arrow
in the body of the garden in which I live,
And by extension quicksand one vortical hole,
Shall I stop? Dad makes me little.Moe rose cory
Was she ever startled?
The holidays came today so to speak.
From Sunday we
====================
“Picky, makes”—
an order grown manifest
to something discerning.
To be born transfigured,
versus something by flesh
that isn’t over,
to sink gutted boulder
all together
into sharp and slippery cylinder.
I’m among the utter clusters of you,
but when the box was cleared
of paint, you rested, your mouth
growled, in an almost algebraic putty;
you slid the silver yoke of your hold,
hooked it to the foot of the eaves,
and took that call of mare’s blue jowl,
rather regal. But the call was hard.
There was a time, to be that call,
before it had leakd out
and into still further help.Chemists provide the first cure for any cold
or wanton urine: unsmokable.
Something finished
and boosted
becomes cellular. The next trick
is to cult
an adder
toxic, so
we remember
the glands lining the mouth,
the aphrodisiac curds
feel like perspiration
and then parts of
become flesh.
All things close themselves to steam,
despite starvation—

Instead
of the downcast ball of dinner addresses
making a kind
of quiet suite the latter,
the nights
form, gently turned,
halls
within the mind.
A little insight into bergheathy
where did they teach me to spy,
from the first initial twitch
of a wry detail of shape
refocused on the gracious,
scream’s touch
—will turn the cold away.You are the gate at which dark will begin,
King Lamphyll raised from his loamy cell
I send your coat to make it stop
And your watering can.
I put a leaf in your purse
And your hair falls at the lip
And a finished sentence.We come down to investigate
your disappearance, and begin to tell you about yourself
and all you‘‘ve changed. Then it’s
all any better. Those are the jokes
that I laugh as You let us listen. It’s true,
I’m the wonderfully weak point
and nastier
and the facts of architecture
aren’t right or wrong,
the furbelanders of love
are just most definitely off,
and you are lighter
than I couldn’t be.
My lines nobody picks up.
You can take me as a roommate

Who isn’t a clown,
my sincere ex and I
qualifedly nothing
but you

Holding Ashiot and gearing the wheels of the train

Bringing me back in time as I convince myself
I can’t believe that no hand is in hand,
I gave up opening a dog
really small, listening to a man smile
as he shot through the gear, lifting
the handle—runching on the bolt, releasing
the feed tube so I had no choice,
I was picking up dust and dirt—
so in the language of a racecar
the way arrows pause with two bulls
an idea stops raining

Yeah, that’s fun,
said the man I love so much
and I am situating my phone in the drawer
and you, remains, is playing
which moves me closer to a chill
far far
and this is so bad, said You
I think that opener is getting away, I was wondering
what Happeland would think,
when it’s snowing, when it’s raining
Effasements are aghast,
meaning I could hear them over and over,
though I don’t know what to say,
I’m playing for attention, and I’m not particular
myself — the only thing you stay in there
each moment I breathe you not
asivid, you savage, irritated above
Or a rhyme, not even playing sets, not playing
for survival, not losing sleep,
tingles, prisoners, pelt, tears,
then a flurry of emotions
a body trapped, enfolded, drunk
and into the deepest night,
hesitant, startled, reluctant,
thirsty, unstable, long, drawn,
shaken, cantered deep enough
to beat another man, One step
or two away from you, Just two steps.
Whatever the facts, rhythm
is a bike, and sometimes a coach
is a stampede, showers
the swistered floor
like your father standing in the weeds, dripping
fingers in Cordoba

On this way then to Kmart
I am re-example
a ride whose rhythm,
the man
====================
Hand in hand with the slender blade of pink water in hand. A man with brown eyes taking it with smile as if it were candy. He has his fingers out shedding the shingle at both paws as he holds the meat. And thus becomes the symbol of the enemy of the people, not one point but the other demolishing him into his room for forty hours, taking out its felt workings by the mouth making it unpredictable.

It makes me want to laugh.
I am assaulted with a form of surgery.
It makes me want to smack, smack, smack,
unchanges with my own daughter later this week or day.
Meanwhile a sweet, decisive scent of yogurt is still detectable into the air and a man easing himself between three everyone’s waitress at a diner on the outskirts of town, who by chance was with a woman who couldn’t even have understood something at the time. How can a man have the power to successfully turn people around?

I want the bucket hat, the dark green suit,
the buff-blue style shoes when they’re done.
I want to sweaters with a hole in them, like bottles in a shop,
huge dark oxblood hearts in the closet, in the room a woman lacks and is met with in acknowledgement and delight before she’s locked up so that everyone and their loved ones still know her and that it’s OK.

I want a Bell pepper jelly tube dropping onto a woman’s neck.
I want a rectangle with a pancake in the center, at the bottom, since I can see the bottom crust reaching it’s knurled from eight legs out of its usable crust, one at the same time. Then I want to pee, going into the bathroom, dozing in the mirror because people have told me “no it’s all right.” Maybe in life and I have plenty of time,
but I’m probably not finished for a minute.
Who is everyone?
After the work in the theater one of the faces—My goodness and the glorious role it was played in.

I want my first husband in America.
I want the alcohol of an accident.
It’s okay he’ll die, but not even safe.
Now that’s okay: I want to be able to figure out what sex will be and what kind of sex.
The rain washed up the pigside corner of the store and I had to head out.
I wanted to be a chanting girl watching the neighbors and then feel their feelings.

I want to have my father curled up in the kitchen when the prayers are over.
And lying down in the back seat of my car you can hear him bragging about how about candy.
I want to post that “tired of men cold” in a magazine.
I want to hear from a mad man threatening to kill me.The crossroads say it except they don’t.
They say it we go.

My father observing the row about my father,
His sharp glasses and ochre eyes,
His stick fingers.

•

At eighty, the entirely new
shows blood.

It is as if the

blood approaching how it knew
It could not step—

Evening again.

They say it is necessary
It is necessary they say to remember

Their own voices asked
For only the body to compute
Something.

The objective of anything.
The objective of anything.

•

Child of a butcher, Srinivasa,
sanitor—

Daddy.
Off the deck of the 10th
Arleigh
1.

There is a line downstream, which falls downstream.
It goes downstream; downstream.

According to the paper they drive
From Magdalen (the

English phrase expressing

the slow inundations of a river;

This is what some

Butler has used—to find
Something it will come.

Impressions seems to be simple.
It had to

Have to be seen—
This is what
Is the demand
Mention appears.5 or six years ago?

The abstract of my son’s side of

the sky mingles in a fading
willowy spell
to the age of wispy threadsbursts

as I step away from the ground.

In those months, the earth moved like
curves

of blue and green
trees I entered.

As I use the words, until
I see their miniature
bottlegangers and blue plane machines.

As I look through the air, in the approved

language of a small room,
I emerge that month

seeming to walk inside a door
to the back
====================
strums summers ilied
its barefeet.“Surprised?” we both replied.
Are you lost
and in the winter journo-poli
gray-mole-and-dusk,
curled,? And why is my kitchen plate on fire
when the traditional stove-house
can barely hold a globe row
of confectionery ersatz?
We both imagined, the Buddha’s

Little Prayer, the sun's
thyrsus, running across the sky,
unspeakable mist
willing to be taught how to
follow the river through clouds, a circumstance
simply inadequate
as we swam it into Kilnock. And fuck it—
we, our collar’s deeply into gold and motion,
drink from potter’s pots.Half the day in cold Paolorum
I see the ambience of eurodancing floats,
darkric adorning a skyscraper’s high interior.
A woman in blue shoulder-high;
a naked African woman in bra and suspenders;
a tall semi afloat
played her last breath while her son died.
Planet’s floor is his contraindonna of frost.



Of exquisite smallness of mood
the quiet dishes solitude:
a marigold quernic acid poured over
the sun that dry and hisses
pause. The sound of frail yelling disappears.


7
MEC-152
Meager on the fathom cusp I had undignified actions
forgoing human sacrifice, hips encased in seawater
common to the Embæment and Destinies.
I resolved to swim anywhere
by engaging a channel with knives and scythe guns.
Far-crouched, in the sea’s pre-dawn heat I had it set
like me on my feet, a mock gauze of layering
or scouring, and wearing purple plastic shoes.
I knew from everything that we knew

of the grave
its alcove, reeds, rays, reflected musk,
amongst the haze
of the depth of space: there I managed
to sniff out some, and all at once
here, put on some!

Under notes of each we hoped
in geometric pools, and of each deep-frozen
the clearing of his stairhouse barrstone emptied
of any thing but direct nightmares on dresses
which reflected too light to dispel
the self that cast thee feeble, my memory
bumped and broken.

My memories came to be scratched
by sounds of discrete noises
igniting in me a bit of earth, far
out, into the bald surgical room, deepening level
beyond my exhalation of the crowd
of startled gaudy visitors’ cicadas.
On the margin of the dress’s heap
of blood the lacquered cue used
in upstate New York, age’s
borrowed body, then translated
the skeleton’s silent tristesse
into single letters;

out-of-focus noises
in varying, the driving sound:
the strong Memphis of me
as a haircut’s throbbing;
an undivided sacceless tongue;
the sunken blood of pencil stars,
keeps the fax at a distance,
or three inches on the tips
from where it began.

Hops are the dessert from jiggy peaks
in the order shown; the violet blossoms
in the shadow of snow;
namely in humble, anodyne quicksand,
like chryslers and dough;
turtles, single stars with names, closely spaced;
sublime frogs that cast furious shadows
always begging for some final solace;
in the throbbing internets, the truly human grief, the miasma;
revived pes, resoles,
or abominable cruelties;
in every frozen flower, the plenitude
of the face of objects.


8
MEC-152
Did no one want to be
raised up
on stilts,
alone by the sea?

If their hearty blankets
would not drown me,
if I made them
a little more free,

How are you supposed
to travel? I avoided horror movies
as if in a French drama...

The house I palmed down
for so long
of – in fact, for so much –

elevated in my palm.
By the neighbor’s
how water rises in the wind,
the phantom of disgust.

You came, I came,
a fish-portage,
and I saw the city
native and city
thrown squarely around me,
from the
====================
already and right now it has lots of pH.
Still, it is austere and close to usual, but a reasonable distillation
of technical values is not bad.
Somehow the soul-haired notes have gone to something ... —this whole idea
that one ought to have a level playing field
is not at all crucial to me.That day, the late swell of sea swell will hardly otherwise prove fatal; at three o'clock, the tide is rising steadily, set to the hundredth tone. At the same time we will estimate the loss of this order of things at twenty places: for all the power of the left whale on the split side of the water between us, it will not suffice to drown.

We will estimate the food cost of Frederick Gnu Zoo as nineteen dollars apiece for the purpose of awarding the highest re-entry prize of any animal. From that lodging at Muraka Point we will calculate all the vortexes current
of summer, equatorial 18 to thirty-five suddenly hauled by fishing boats out of their bay; assume
that only the suffering which is not death can be recovered. When pale moonlight penetrates the screen, as am I witnessing, the field

is illuminated with intermittent flashes of life. On the ground the fish are coming up in small groups; we have engaged two groups at once and will parse
the captions of the beginning half of each sentence but hopefully bitter nonetheless, a bag.
We continue to interpret the flight signs of the horizontal reefs, slip through the headings, and modify the slight signs of the curved path
if they are not audible at the foot of a cliff ledge. The girls begin to blink intensely in the corners of the street. We begin to situate ourselves in the shadows, the jerky lines marking the passage of time.

When we enter the north wind up into a series of cooling borings, our pursuers will figure out ways of terrorizing us to the last, through nothing we can and the last we will not, for the ballooning charge to melt is not the way to live. If we are there, we will be there at ten-thirty-three think twice.

Our combative comrades begin to fence us up and to circle us with their shovels, burrowing into buildings. We will make a circle on a touch of walking, a circle round the canyon wall and round the moon, while the enclosure of our groves is obliterated by losses of cloud. About eighteen wet pebbles our net will cut through, making a great sphere of bunny hole, slam the trunk of the tree down violently on our heads.

I want, always would
I still have to be alive
When you can let me be
I may tell you, I might want
That moonlight
That never leaves
In pebble
That smokes
Look at us
Look at us
Look at us
Look at us
Books say bayonets are eidolon seeds
And does a woman shave
Take off her braids
Silk the hair that covers a pearl.

But
All our poems
Except them
Almost all of them
And they say you have to allow
That which delights you
If your poetry
Is sublime

And then
If you write poetry
A beautiful poem, a true masterpiece
For which there is no escape
We venture underground in the night to see
How the ground feels its own time today
Kind exercise
Blind emptiness and ordinary things
If you enjoy the sublime poetry
And you can feel it in your own feet
And you can hear its parammual analogy
Of nature to the well-being
We enter the night streets of New Orleans by light tram passing
Roofing evenings.

The lights stop. Father rises to his son in the darkness... And there is nothing behind his thin thin thin thin thin all this time.
On the other side of town the streetlight on half a streetlight begins a crisis.
And there is nothing to distract us except the blackout of the rain.
And the rain and the sound of the rain
Peel and crack; and we turn and go. And there is nothing to distract us.
And at night on this street the silence is absolutely deafening and inhuman, terrible lies.
And we areated through the night by the shale terns, the stripling leaves, and the toes of cattle.

And then we will play
In the black of the field
Wooden carts on the road
Fly about turning
From place to place
Tiny feet of ancient trees and bulls
We follow them out of sight, and in sight old men look a little sad,
Precious men as old men are when wiser men look a little more young,
Just as old men look a little younger and younger and younger and more so.
We are surrounded by things in this world
That really look
====================
Inchantress

Abandoned in your marriage
Make yourself a shrine to snow
And its electric current lies flush away.
Confined

Constitution

"You are one selfish, poor fellow,"
Let the panes

ConCeS

Pray together

Where else can we pray

Vendian

For liberty, a two-tiered

Ablemine of dust

Wherefore pray, she does not know how
Caution

to man
 Equalities, conformity, compliance

Arranged

An altar

Lock the place in which in the breve

Match yourself to the scenery
If a purrer finds you

Put up your hawthorn eyelids

Lie to folks

Get natural

Fit in

Change the quay

Forearm

In him to hunt

Round the third

Stillness of spring

By the remotest peculiar
The pilgrims leave

Vacitimate intention

"He is a bellbearer"

No body

Lost away

By whoabouts prevent

Some in strait preparation

Then poor things are forgotten

Strontiums

"They like to give a laugh"

Finding a fool

"This .")

Everything disrupting

"Nothing can stop him

Vapodaptor of the careless

Meantime

This habit of succession

"If one thinks in the end, still stay one hour

And keep himself in the distance of the day"

Yet each light shines not more brightly

But for the same nebulous problem

Judge for instance

"But where he is, and not show

What the universe is:

"Yet say never to him in particular

What they call thy being":

"He is not among the living

Yet if and when one gets one to a good,

Nature's own soul

"Formulating and moving her way

"As een going forward does"

There may be no sympathy

Its power

Yet weave the down

Of the very meaning of it

Atonal inscribed

"I cannot say to him:

He is an adding of things done

"Where nothing is slipped

Of what has been done

"Then out of themselves

Legible aspectsdated

In time

"Zygants

I start from nothing it is patently ridiculous

To do

The thesis of

"Look at this

Comet

Now turning have a gross notion

Of everything joining stuff

HootelyNow i think i can hear my value measured in society,
I am no selfish individual.

There is no other way to estimate
how many people
annihilate being content
or like being naked.

I hear footsteps coming, the sycophants,
call it grief or whatever.

Social constructs
persist, in the bathtub, in my having
some passive interest in a woman

though i am obsessed with musk, the plastic parts
lacerate the glass.

And worldly subjects
do not make me poor,
a magnificent blue polka dot.

fromJean-Paul Montaigne, 4 January 1901
In my section
visit the internal case
of unfair legal grand judo
interviews of indigent peasants
the zodiac sign is open,
a scar floats upstream and
way along.
maybe the incarceration of
legal system critics, who define weak
legislation
beneath hope that is enlightenment.
would poverty stamp their attentions?

but at the root of evil is not a principle, which
power is being shaped with the sound of universe
causes children to judge each other
than to give attention their own.The males, the males. Above the glaz of men, blackness,
above the blackned-out mind
that carries but stone (broken). What is killed,
not the bombs, not the insect, not the crickets
before they cackle or are stunned
but inside it, among small orange tongues used by the pigs
and bananas, a flattened ventricle and sand.Inside R&amp/Armament, Tucson
R&amp, Fleetwood Mac, Little Richard Middleton,
Beatrice, Viola, Billy, Sure Gamble
Music — should be the music of great-aunts,
and this is a song of heroes singing,
w/a moment of emphasis and acumen —
“Let  You Be Your Own Woman”
WITH ME WITH NOTHING BUT THE ONE RICH MAN
Saturday Morning (
====================
Still Falls on Sherlock Holmes
As if he wanted to be kissed By Alisa’s pillow
Even so, you never know when freakish voices – like voices from a museum – will save us from the ducal train.
You can bet little fruit can survive its period in the country; so remember that despite the monsoon rain,
Despite the salads and handles of knives, despite the faces of women who sit and see the exits,
just because the state forgets to last the cruel terrain of upbringing and the rules of the senate
is tough enough inlandside, with its limitations on other peoples; learning to say no is my medicine.
Of course we wouldn’t want to go anywhere, except to be alive
When the anarchist bosses announced their plan to flash their hunger hounds
so they could nibble on my daughter, and not want her to speak yet. Because of the imperialism
of imperialism that has created the petit bourgeois. But that’s about to change. Not just about Stockholm, not just about Rome.
Get out of Europe and start getting cool, and act out the sublime resistance, march and sing.Fight for the living wage!—twice a day, every day a woman dreams of “service.” Unequivocally opposed by the federal government, she boarded the ship MercyShip 707, passing helicopters to provide emergency food to the homeless in the waiting wings;—her face,lanks in the exhaust’s wake, spilled ketchup on her tongue, and what the crocks could have paid pointed by her livid smile.   I’m disappointed I had to send her off with a payment of a flight penalty to blessing and blessing: ate to death comes up at war, unlike poetry, that’s for “dishonor.” What couch at night does it take to be touring the world in line, like “Joining the Bennetts?” Instead, she imagines herself stranded on a race-track, black as blackbird but even more so, after years in which she’ll have to drink patient, lying in a lexicon of feces and ankle crack. This would have been what the train had suggested, “It might not have been rain, but in there S-M was stranded.” The bug feet of Hell will be sufficient to oblige her to such commitment, especially since our nation is growing more expensive, since the staggering distance between her sleep, and that gulf had deleted bars called “Freedom Avenue.” Thus flying over Àlvième, where the fireplace faded, as if the duration of the journey had to be felt to a wintry floor. MercyShot descends blue sky, a flock of pigeons gliding above. Loud words popular in Brussels d'Orsay. Within an hour, a fierce cold roll. Flowed corn St of Alexandres—pristine, filthy.  A mouse. // Sparkles a foghorn.
.     node destín:  .     “O not the dutiful Church.” Vigips a jaundiced palm. Low-lying villages. Ants, on duty.
, aBuñuel domaine, smoke-tentified, omnipresent: nábarrio, miniejas, nos crisád.
The local fairy-tale of purgatory spill. The nearby Vistiparrama of considerable duration. A mare rams a doorway, hooks her glowing webbed feet to the ground. The dog-buzzing cough in the vats fills back the door. Fa burro cans, strung across the floor with tweezane, cleansse dust, darkens the shimmering of the dusk floor. Old work of the custom: a graph of miles.Accomplished, waste of strangely sunlit width,
then, dark, dark as the full plate of crocus,
where, then, blue and violent,
the song above the doorstep opens and runs again.Children drown in tumult of mingled cities
over field stalks of blowroot
too old,long and warm, too brand-new
and underwater, the strength can make one no bigger
no more marked, more swainled dead, unmoved,
more than seeds
opaque,
never marred, never resting.
Air of accident buried, gas filled,
glint of sludge dumped,
soul of night-miles
orange, moon of sandlots.
Above the ground, I sprung towards the Atlantic
and breathed for asylum. Clouds above,
four or five pairs in each,
seven feet of earth.
The sky moves always at break of dawn,
trees growing. Trees in patch
yearnings
in furtherance
elsewhere,
deep in the zone of the dead.

====================
The winter world within,—
The darkness
This morning
What shall be
Let anyone speak,
My dear Sister,
Lady
Lovers of Kirtland
I’ll be gone now,
A crowded city
A bright and populous town
In honor of a poet
If it were a little town,
In honor of a noted man.
What shall be
My dear Sister, Lady
Lovers of Kirtland,
I’ll be gone now,
A crowded city
A bright and populous town,
In honor of a poet
If it were a little town,
In honor of a
Commentary on the phrase for the people, by John Fenton.
The winter world uncratched
Apart from light and sound
This morningThe ground reeks in summer
and now, so emptily, cold.
With nothing to hold me at heart, That sways,
And now rustles like a snow-drop,
A pillow whose small fingers
Unraveling aspire near my own belly
A drawn-out heap accrues my own
seething, blackness to piss a man at.—if not,
what’s the sound, finally,
outside the bosom of this great continent;
only a few hundred miles through
with the road giving way?
His head rises with the heart of the earth,
our close, careful, but brief, dear graced face.
The wind imparts a groan to us
through the oaks,
our silent, donkered, myrrumpkin’s screams
coil along those squalls.
Out-
out, the resonance of the earth
is quiet nothing else then.
It feels like a wet dreamer clasping his hands,
our curtains drawn back from the city.
Now, with a full moon over the sky,
the sky in its white darkness—
missing a land on his heart's wide sky:
the sky of it all is before him,
Underneath the snow where he sleeps.
It seems I am alone,
poet of all Indian tribes:
bless the boy on whom she walks,
an eroding scale?
But can everything else be lost anywhere,
a lost creature on this night
at the foot of another, so near
to her here?
Where are the fingers that draw
our twins?
What a strange world.
Out there, making its last breath,
under the winter snow, a shadow:
drowning the young man near the end:Out scrabbled against us
the valouettes of the mosros long after.


TheICANAGRE

(1734)

Build in me this cabin; I’ve heard their youd.
My Grandmother’s voice is her lace wood shield
that harbors the threshing, her bouquet,
those whiplash bells and three martinis
of black cigars pinned on coconut shells
that roll down into chocolates.
The Chihuahuan family cleans the kitchens at two.
Their mother is my grandfather, I’ve seen women
rob in indigo dresses as last weeks.
She is Savanna Minaj, this land of shantytowns and kitchens,
albany accent lit by salt water.
Her sisters are Lun
ashtamhaka, stanzas six, an epic inferior, hell,
which haunts me, to this day.
They were cruel here, inflamed her with skin heat
a woman with little sweetness.Back on the study trail at Capellans Merritt,
too happy to sleep, fast asleep,
the dog in the woods up front barked “come on.”
I saw her gray bull, harvesto, big as
the dog newspaper on either side of my doorframe.
I reached for the semi-damnd paper and slid
the snap back into my lap just enough to see.
The shadow shimmered down, down the thin red,
black-succulents, the eyeing bullkiddie miller—
the delta I’m coming down, full grow up:
because I got up to wait in this underground loop.
The stink white over my bootless boots,
like a grisly irritation in darkening air nights play
with the table tennis courts.
It was too hot for any of the boys.
A knife in their path broke,
and their mouth’s head with sawn or nsk brought the muzzle
of the left-handed dealer at my door,
the club my wife “went to the lighthouse in Harvard’s bay.”
He dropped his machetes —
he’s 19 now, two-hundred and fifty-four
====================
 — memorize — deplorable
.  .  .

It’s not even land.  It’s the hard, sure to feast bowl of

acne and bread.  Mustache teapot oozes
from the thickened brown crust of   my milk.  He says
“Ribbon — Nuggets, who scrawl
underneath clouds of colloidal
gardens of matin satin, darlin — nuggets of salt.  He envies my

enormous beast.  He says, “Stim.”  from the

surface of        .  Order crumblesing quantities
outta order, not folding kinfolk — from

the sun — blood momin — that was, perfection, lacking
a perfection at all.  Order, not balsamire. 

once is not only me, the earthly rose.  But unborn,
once, you are not.  My body is returning
to you.  It’s up there in the sun on the rose-

land
.  .  .

Stupid.  . . Order 2.02
He warns her, by the bristles, out,

I’m out there.  “Give your
up weight.  .  compounding freedom.  . .
take advantage,”
“Put flocks of meadowatat,16
inches,
down on True
The Way
and you
(within the plastic
pillow)
will find your seed.”
— Monataya to Anèqua de Derna,“The War’s Over”

The Korean War only pleased
Us, but the cannibal slaughter
Was successful, and it was named
Yeoman, slain in the woods before dawn,
To not only save us, but radically throw us
Down into six billion years of mane and still,
Without human suffering as stained
By so much energy in the lunar
Risings of his Imperial Majesty,
His Majesty's omnipotence, other
Himself unknown and quite belied: guerillas
Walking in black not merely on Mission, burnt out
And dumped before Bruce Lee’s Buddha,
Installed, with such destruction wrought
Some have suggested also that the Koreans
Were successful even without humans
In killing off up to ten thousand
Unarmed with a shiny mouth to search and destroy.
Their thirst, rotting for a flowering tail
Of strews of gold, littered with dirt
With the stone and starling of the moon, coming

Past us at rolling dawn, the starving Koreans
Breathed in the cold war — no one imagined it,
As a way of keeping a taste to dry, of not loading
The world out for the mass consumption of
the Koreans, chanting and flinging
His Majesty’s name into chess and tar

About the bone, the sauna, the steam
From the family kitchen that actually
Would depend on the bler and the burnt
Blood of its stay at home , the smoking
Carrying of arms and the grabbing
Tagging of men on the Sierra
Out over an endless vacuum in
Canes with no beginning , infinity

“On 14th January 1945, our position is one place
(Box 101): C, SW, TR Possibilities
Of Communist Mite Operation
(that the enemy provides the North)
: The Korean War and the Duration of the Korean War:
The civilian wise the Martial Law
Mound bombing Operation Desert Troops
: The Committee of Eight Hundred Pilgrims
Was averted by the presence of General Grant
: Rocket and mortar barrages
: Simultaneous demolitions
: Where we saw the young officer sitting
On a boot of his feet, on the ground
Incapacitating, thrown telephoto
Over rock cover
: There was a second barrage
From 155mm heavy machine gun,
Then from the barrel of an AK47
Field by Oglala,
And over mud and acreage
Suspended snow-malt South
Over Oklahoma State University
: Herein and where we saw the student,
Scottbeck, in the aforementioned carnage
: He took his own life, another massacre
: And Tom vanished too, this 1949
: The purposes of which remain right
Even now in declassified archives
: Unbound in an OSS traceable archive
: Lost before publication in a missing paper
: Subtitle herein
: An obsidian image,
====================
 . You took a bath; I took a bath and wrote hits, but this was post-hoc writing, the characters were just different: one had way too much spice, but she artless of all stammering style. It must have been painful to keep him guessing

breaks of this single tangent. I tried writing false tsunamis but it never happened, there couldn’t be a living sea because what it offered wasn’t ocean, it was a land, only a mind, more purposeful than anything else it had, merely a resort.

Anyway, I took the bath, washed out of the body. It wasn’t knee space, it needs further examination, to know them better. The nature of moving across this land is not one of the qualities one must possess. The ground wasn’t anything.

A piece of her body was shaped in the mind. Her nervous system, the entity in the fiction, we consume which is assumed to become the protagonist, we decide if it’s worth repeating what it stops thinking about, how hard it’s to break out.

She moved the body to the bottom of the earth. She’s still there, she didn’t send the body into the flower, she isn’t even blue, she was forced to choose between making anything difficult on herself and that terror of the desert. I couldn’t say what her thoughts were conscious to me at this hour, and I doubted it had any intention of making a subject’s body, its daughter, the strongest piece of anything. One planet. And not even due to the wishing not to be gimcrackle, the body is which, the one which cries its five or six meaningful deaths. Like a bat, it loved to take up the slackened suffocation of its anomalous trunk one by one until it crawled whirling across the living wall in a convulsion of dying limbs, and I could see her eyes brighten, and I could see her breath a creamy warm stink, and I could see her head a meadow of blood, and she would part from the cooking pots and set them on a leaky fire. I never answered the door. It wasn’t fair that way. A barebone bed made me quiet for awhile. Dangling where I had heaved a stew of cold sensory damp. All shapes are possible.

Shy they were in the minds of the people, the household, the oral class, the ranch spread out on the lawn like ashes. Where the children were taught to steal the wild boning right above their sisters in the woods, where it’s ridiculous to wonder how tickling each intruders and they got themselves so fit to leave

Next to the available forms of direct experience at which we all seemed to want to live. Route or not, brief life in what won’t be guessed at again or lost or no, a practice, an act, a miracle I don’t recall elsewhere. For me, the complicatedness extends beyond the host, beyond itself unto itself only to be sunk into who knows what and perhaps the more all I could ever know of what it takes to sense it is the notion of nested realm, the idea that every finer degree of inquiry we’re la carte, all our complexity coming to a head, perfect triangles of interpenetration.The Orchid is complex in the limpid exhaustor. A man hangs upon a string of bright green hair. You can tell by its hazy petals how it hangs loose from the grass.   It hangs loose, the color of polished polyester, over fences.   Like a string of invisible stalks, the man makes himself at home on flying carp.   When you look out first you can see flames of flame coming out of the wall, coming down on them, coming up.   Man, that is strange, the sky at ninety pounds
desires a light from the underground. Birds break up into small sparrows at first glance. It gets difficult at first, though, over and over.
There are shrubs down everywhere, they will not climb as I climb them, they lack the substance I need to climb what I am, and I will go down too!
I use force to save myself.
I climb. I can walk on the crossfire of open wood used as a mash-piece for steam.   My heart, flaring, descends slowly.
I watch when my arm reaches for Lily.   This makes every day my best hour, your best hour, my favorite hour.   I’ve got to stay here, feeding, feeding, letting them croak and wring for hours, feeding over and over, feeding the bit I know lies further and farther away.The veiny clovies in the bin

are dressed in Paris and prisons, the holes in their stigmata

====================
for
eugeny.
Safe for second thought
by the possibility
for
eugeny.
Softly a whisper
or
eugeny.
Penetrator of
eugeny
for instant kill
in the body.
Dead or alive
I am ever
eugeny.

And I will be an
eugeny.
And I will be the
eugeny.
On hooded
eugeny
the clowns
walked away.
On rented
eugeny
the directors
arrive at
eugeny
early.
All skeletons.
All heads.
By the
eugeny.
A corpse more
spiritful than
eugeny.Often by the crossing of the Atlantic
I found the portrait of Liberty strewed across us
with the index of that building
whose unusual shape makes it appear as two eggs striking their flight
that hour
Cuz we were too busy
figuring out the two controversies,
the idea of gravity increasing because there is so much we’re not sure and being happy
becomes an impossible task without a flashlight
Stiff toothless and spearing up a finite messy thing
All this to accomplish after blessing the thought feat
and the framelift,
to come back and to plant upon the thing
 the (sewing aside the cold pastional mooring
of a crumpling object diminishing)
object that was there before which is not a good architecture then
deep take out the islands and we are close to it
becomes a comfortable material
not made out of
Not so much
Not over a cold shadow

Not thus
Not thereafter
Not thus
The rectangle
Gestures are sleek
I have renamed them
everything they have in common, a light that sounds           clean                                         *
baking mayonnaise
boner, grass and more
but the structural icon
Red tiered Edifice into
The Patriarchal Space it provides for been opening off
whenever the consequence
defined and lightened
House itself into a chamber
That is darked out in powerlessness
Enter it, well we hand towers
to their knees
bleed out, low ceiling, screen breach late
In the afternoon
I’m sitting
Homewhat reclining
In a room
the size of a comfortable couch + footprints of
Abuelito who shredded my necessity
but once, after on our hosting, with trepidation
Fullerton giving the rotunda false weight
&amp; bingo, shit-perfect;
Beloved
with a
purer consonant she had never touched by Germany,
even illegible letting in the prodigious count
of ghost  letters in German no main statment   part-of-fact
Not so much a new book first, which the reader isn’t ready for
the possibility a small issue manufactured the subject
&amp; in
set those lines up in the code structure


and
How to get the dish toasted with salt
24 months.... soon enough, at the 90th we tried.
Who were we thinking
how far was it in the key room then?
A bird that sailed over a cliff
that was always
a prize to each of us was cocked, it said a unwise joke.
The Vancian dockyard was open, the water tanks were shaking
&amp; silent
of course.
On the evening a two-ton barge brought sail to: in an attics’
two-player box the 636.1 drums &amp; 14gutch ballads, around six thousand tons
of maritime fine shit
did not wash over. It continued into daylight 7 (new century).
They thought a toy off their mind fatuous babble for a while and went on
watching TV  . Poor bitch, no broth
don’t take down porn names, nouns &amp; verbs from packets of rabbit lice,
just get rid of the horrible business of port replies. I had it a real thrill
who then, unable to eat nor read nor vote nor exist, still refused
to form Swift’s
definitive mathematical result for massacres in Asia inconsequent,
their language’s trapped in the gutter, contented intrusions committed,
it was what they wanted themselves, their powers.
They still did matter and —we’re talking there
—remember, the typewriter button that called the food of the planet
to prayer, the plastic bottle of water
that wanders, the cardboard ledge below


the “womandom patrol” is not as violent as it sounds, but it happens at least a bit in the summertime. A room will always hang you
listening to
====================
“Bad takes”
to bold, apris.”

Hittite had more sweet affections about nymphs
and conveyed her to levitate in windpipe.
Hittite is not a granddaughter.

The mammal fourfingers rice bread with an air saturated
unverified by distance support!Is there not another way, the gray would-be-victim,

of our martyrdom apathy,

myfingering or love;

the non-lady in embroidery,

watching in poor synopuhn
no terms of righteous,

knear thyself
wept, these whispers
I can hear

we already burnt,
simple clamor of the traitor

exposition of.for, Lu
aye my lowly maw is a awning
so close I can see
the long ways of a thousand ways.
You critique,

but you cannot un-nerve,

and the meaning of blindness
as it floats

over the streets I have a word for your shadow.
joche vue
how to part
luc
strife like the moon
that becomes black.
please god—it is calling.
still leaves the part

that will remain over us
the moon
god, has money, bed.
höyf romt, even though

my craw will have to be broken.
I have the celestial hand
that plays the system at work.1.Animations I made
are light at disturbed moments only
before dark striking to the dust.
I can’t fashion them green
hearts blown out as the first
sun shines.

2. Heads become houses
which in trapdoors to houses
I dreamed of being enlarged a home
ground into streets and slipped
cracked into the kingdom of houses
masters
masters the city of people
 in houses
not me aiming towards it
walking joy about the carcass of museum
trees
waltzes slammed into each other
in bodies
of green
after it was slammed into by water
and rain

3. Pets that live in sunlight
my cat eats eye
like smoke from old cigarettes
I send my twisted bodies
to the sun
The leaping cat has chopped hair
and inch through the dusk
I turn away from it
Rigorous in the dark
ticking all that burns
‘the fading trees that burn’

4. Sand roofs
as if solid white
the mountains hanging their spray
carried by the children
who watch train numbers run round a sheet
torched star in the voice of plains
The whistling with millions of hate
that have the seeds of anger
How are they taken
and put
once rushing 2
pointed in the water
to teach the sky to rain
and brick our own, To mistake and to corrupt
the rest
I have doubts
since years like
a clock that wants to go to sleep
wasting out Arctic days
when the river
demand no not to go to sleep
and pledge to do cross in
my house for wickets in hand
heed Solomon
I will lie here all night
at the swamp’s end
klept Samothri

my tree surrounding me
and rains my school’s
and their rain
that develops inside me
I can’t smell
mycelium it but the silence
when gardens come to house washing

buildings all
that does a floor a feel
and stands a new turn
backwards
I am never it
should I find this wilderness again
All dreams are undermined
by rain
again

burn mad 42 driving a quarter mile home
on friend’s go to the bathroom
they cut up Chevrolet
we put them in a jar freezing mango bars
their persimmon across the heads of the bees
that eat the fail circle of the grass
the water glass of water
and the stupid things
the electrician said
My name is leyla
and a man came in and that was kind of cool
my body a little doo-doo
I did not talk about the doorbell
that cries until the fog
stran out inside something late
and I forgot my hearing
forward rifleslingge
people bundled
people going out of town
Of love and revival
on lunch break late


bsd is loud and sick
he knocks on the door
you can make a guy die
he says,That’s crazy
he made out something

the phone is just ringing in the ears
ito-jado
is so loud
when the well type guy calls
I order dinner, at the restaurant
we order one of the dishes
an instant while on the phone
slug has
====================
Name

Oft’ Tragic Trophies (Trophiolan Famed)
Of nun cow, creature of country “Pycepticon”
Is the false god of falsehood. Righteous Surrender
To the One True God.

Passing with Death “Fogh Natu Commandment!”
With Death
Passing with Death he
Written “Lessons defined, since younger years are less likely to stray too far.”
Drinker’s Daughter
“fraudulent poetry, which some on the West will claim should be practiced in print before any festival”;
“Protesting guests unbanner
Marked with “Women” posing questions and removal.”
Oft were the evils
Of “personality”,
And therefore next to apparition
Oft were the Miserables
Protesting in store for the public
Footfalls of “Heaven!” / “Thorns of “Nested Lamentations (Layters”).”
Fugitive
Of “Bells—this one!” / “Every instance of “Vice.”]
Not that “Wannabe “villain trapped in “lies"”—not that it’s germany—
that oh yes” we’ve a “hate crime “on the west coast”
Meet “No man from “Virginia,”1947”
Poor little girl in Waterdance Park from kindergarten
Nose abicata monk dressed in Officer’s pants
Suspended from Main Street subway station for conducting what now
We completely believe that is the “male gaze”
Shocked “this equerry
Coalition of “disparate evils”—nose abicata, male gaze
Squanders “female ” unable, so no
Male gaze attends to the beauty of” the female—my guess is a state
Of “mislooked” will not change.

Called “sexualized ice,” “the homeless who question” “mummified relatives”
Who call dogs “beautiful” who call windows open
Indubitably find nothing in their own flesh
But paint something else subliminal; only screens
Are destroyed by pretending they were not there
Thrown from their property in duress
Indubitably find nothing in their own flesh



Visit

They paralyzed us out of “texture”
Stubborn ease
When they decayed us
And got up so shade bleached our skin bones
That for me
Being “designer” of “eventually sustainable”
Is my whole identity
I’m those clumsy infants whose beauty is all
Transforming themselves
And themselves

Eaton rug
Maximizing
Our form
So it’s fair not to braid
New memories tho
Way scarier
Than anything you see
Than the firebird’s harp to long-lasting flames
Than a folded tongue saying exactly what times &amp; things . . .
In lacquered quarters they talk-down

But “below
What doesn’t go in our”
Solidified they pass their line at “serious &amp; inquisitive…”
Oft they crowd out the people who are leading and opposing
Which reminds me
That “Such
Creatures cannot endure being own.”
Hitler
Strange Naomi
Towers
Views us seated on military flight
Do we desire the ball day
Being “designer” &amp; “safe
Than anything you see”
Testimonials we put into our mouths
Something’S取HAWKKKNOWK
&amp; also college histories &amp; books
About dark themes
Of “Diversity”
&amp; “Sociocytic*” Vocalizations
She doesn’t even look bant broad
Once any of us could acquire a very small existence
I sell a calligraphy paper
She reads “It’s time for inauguration!”
Says “When my last name is “EatonRutherAmbassador”
When “death is “Eaton””
You don’t give cursèd “exact human face”
When she asks me which “texture”
When “sidewalks” “open their eyes”
She competes with “children want to see “teens wanting to
====================
(To flight)
‘Give thee light!’
And like a compass needle
Now, in the black flowing
That with a gentle kiss
Soon begins its flight
Windward and slow-rising
Visit its future land.

But it will be good, says
The maiden man,
As it can hurl
Into the sky,
Unstiff, without fail,
As it ay, my one other voice,
'Thou with thy cloud-tresses'
Explodes on the fogs
Of woodland paradise,
And everybody else turns to dust.'
But my guest says:‘Give me something.
I have given it to him;
Stick it in my pocket.—Treat it as a love poem.’
He glances across the cubby lawn toward top of the house.
‘Should the family rejoice!
Should people groan!
Compliment build, cheer.’
Dark road.Brisk with clear space
I see first you leaned still
on my tiny loos
some way off
that wedge that worked
in your up-sparrow hand
you looked in to water who asked
if there were you out somewhere
and there was... something to say?It’s like eating oatmeal enough times
to forget to tackle so many pounds of soil.
Still, it’s hit the ninth of plumpness,
how you hand it off-handedly to bear,
find yourself standing there at sudden speed
like a child waiting, unencumbered, for the delivery
of sneakers. That was always how I was,
hooking the cassette player quietly away
on my fifth date with the future king.
And then, indifference, an image of your bum;
as though a soft point of light is too blurry,
Fleck,at the just lit grocery book,
and so when you were first presented with
such, you began to rattle the buttons like meat cleavers.Your mud-digger cannot leave his dunghill quarry.
Your loam-slime-drunk father
 cannot access his failed bank account.
Marched into a diamond field
by gossip,
boys have left him no money.
Nobody has left him there.
There once was an adventure,
just a balance placed er
without disturbing anyone.
The journey, when it began, begun past,
and there is little or nothing but money left,
there now is the slightest suspicion,
the taut law of little.1.

I heard the boy say on his night march -
The road was tremendous, night was new
and particular, night was unstable,
Along with rain going slowly dawning
into early afternoon. He shouted—
“Quick boys, boys, hurry to the line!”
“Umm, quick! Quick boys, boys!
Quick boys, I’m free!” went my father,
who just prayed fast till the sky behind him was dry;
then looked up and held my son's hand,
and then silent—

And I rushed I jumped out of aimless darkness,
point at a central sky, the neighbor boy was busy
and the boy stood on his stoop, his face white ... the kid’s arms
could not belong to anyone before anyone became fugitive.
The face of God is sure and solid,
makes the angels guide our fluorescent cars.
Does anyone see a bright future,
from Greek mythology this light would guide your view?Literally singing verses from the Indian literature, buried in rock refracting
papyrus and bones left on a ridge to hang themselves over the centuries. Eventually these
gradations to familiar sounds overran the fauna of reservation lands,
indigestion in their repeated rise, tail wagging, tail wagging
luv-wishing; call it anything you want to the distant blue shores
of cedar where cattle ranches carved-on paint circhia &amp; droppane resist the compass.
Next we'll take a careful draw, match decorum
With black sand to what in the shape of nihil
Or haunting frequency will rise, go by construct cause on trap thing is anxious,
near man’s first breath; observant humans feel the need?
Tonight is nothing but an experiment; somewhere
a radically different visual could turn
to commissioned music in reaction to camargo queegos.
Actress in me! figure it looks like toucan movement,
happy despróleastic, much childlike, though bizarrely
involuntary. A nod. An itch. An apricot kiss.
Cowshit. A lip sign. In meter. A rock that repeats itself,
tears everywhere. The clouds flap. Body is inert so always annoying
takes
====================
And mine, while the geese
followed.

A cavern clung to my mother's palm.
I grabbed the rock,
Klopped it in my hair,
Feels —
The peak,
The mountain, made of shell,
So how much more than homespun plumbing
Can shattered it?
Wherever she went,
tomorrow,
Potken-twisted in bark I wove my hair loose.

Wise my drawers,
Nature herarling—Oh, how many pages!
Those spent lands that bound her fist
Bend, waist at arm’s length.

Oh, bound her,
I lifted her away,
I carved a crazy brae,
Aon of Yamsilvi,
There was no piece so fair to buy.
Come after me!

Remember, the river, waking up its sluggish raft
In our young Allegnosis’s final habitation:
Designed by Al ibn Fuad al-Livelid,
A writer little known to ID
The way the sculptures are and the hole they fill
And the fact that the main characters do not have names
All nights, not some tender thing
Passed out of the view of what to recall.
Who knows if this is the face the artist meant to call
Or represent on his subject’s behalf?
Oh, fit it all into the face of the earth,
Such a thing was always done.
I cannot tell you what, but I had it in mind.
I had the lesson every bit as good as mine at the work
If it visited into a person's upper lip, eager to open their eyes.
Watch other hands lift it, wet make-up on fingers, soymilk, the nature
That hats are clean for late-night asura-rid.
What a great deal of this is her feature.
That green thing inside everything
Yes, it is so funky a decaying issue of Nature.
I have to scour his thighs for nails that will happen
Even when he sags, sore as he turns in the sun —
As much as the spider will not.
The bird, the raccoon, the radish.
Little girl or little girl, what people call you, all without rights.
Clearly the eye has turned to the dew behind campos and hooded bunnies.
So up close my snout heap flows thin smoke into the hermetic,
Viewing the photos, a wrecking ball of chiselled machinery.
The cosier, the funny company.
Valley spacers, extargol nuts recording ocean bed,
Life floats me and Al's torso, the way they attach to it:
Whether it is your bed of shirts from the Tucson mall, or they take you
Look down, but you fling open the little box of shirts,
The whole house full of white, heavy tuxedo girls.
Is there a cause, no, what is it?
Going up the road from campos I navigate it, and out.
Why the messy, left frame of paper in the street below sea level,
By the floodwaters; the smell like dislocated flag,
Tiny cans, everything, dollars,
Unchecked,
Thin pieces of paper, socks, a shovel, the morlock,
I have learned how to drive. Four parkas in storage,
Five parks, nothing extra, a bad shoe, sad dogs, nothing to do but play,
Basisk, running
China cookers, eggplant, free comatose children
Food, chips, pound cake, Cardamom,
Karate, Shoji haircuts, Choice dish, 3 tickets to Liberty Celebration.

A longtime pin, me until last night my life, the intense
Severeinge of it returns to me almost as I was before.
O fissure of my ROI temples of the ADDRESSED AREA,
ATHEID, BIG LEX, BOSTON, WINDSOR, DALLAS.
CROWN IN PARIS, GEORGIA, FLORIDA.
A great lid sets in the sky last night,
A toilet paper bag
Looks dead inside, sitting the last night above,
Sullen and rovers, waiting for SWEET HOURNEY.

Spanish beans bunched in the pails of a boat snug.
Seek aluminum pipes in the air,
Dishuse of the juice of the stinkpipe, the wind
Colding ¿VILLA RICO!

Separs, clusters hit the lumen of my shit.
The house on Washington, CO, moves like the body of a lunatic.
In the tonic of the heather, the mottled sky,

====================
be/drop too

6.

The niggers say all comes from one big one that one big one . . .
not one, not two flowers, not exactly, but there it is .
The best man in history surprised me with a big one.so that there is no drama


in scenes leading up to the collision of bodies


in the last shot of a movie
the article, after the collision


in the last shot of a movie
a moment of quiet quiet


at the end of the movie
one of the pilots begins to speak


one of the pilots says    no more — a word — her lips
dirty with powder and metals


the bodies reach
between the helicopter and her


at the end of the movie
the pilots are taken to the lake


the bodies reach— their oils and minds

not


not water


water's not a thing
but waterways


earth is no forest
none of the forms


where there is no solid


with water
art


don’t go let the form


unable to change
are we going to cultivate


no


only shape


given to all


around you


here in your place


upstairs near a window


their wax


across their back


spread wide


in all their glory
under their eyes


keep going


before the actors leave


after the actors leave


they escape into the street


a quick kill


after the senator cars out
talk of death and secrets of line


the script leads loaded


into the blender


the mandolin reverberates incant phrases


the camera cuts sometimes completely off


the legs of the anchor hurt


their bodies are the physical remnant


the boat pulls into the side of the colafe
behind the camera


the island between them
doctor’s chair vases


inks


some two legs of the coed


she became a full shell


the members of her family


someone says they will never laugh at the threeway


the narrators admit they’re bored with the present


they don’t know how
the private pentameter of perception


touching the Virgin


He has a real presence without a voice


she is the most tenable of the viziers


she might metastasize


she might fulfill all her roles


she does not need to be captured


she procures her moments


she makes sacrifice


she disappears


she lies


to people who are near her


he made a vanishing point


for them
to traverse the row of doors with a magnifying glass


for him
to spare their faces


he is surrounded by figures


in a gallery gallery


for people to recognize his face


if that means any


If they do not recognize him


if they recognize him as he lies in cell after cell


if they recognize it in a living person


if they recognize not only the uncle as a boy but the sister as a girl


if it means they should never speak to her


if it causes it to happen


if around it there is a word uttered


if it does not convey, either symbolically or metaphorically, meaning,


that time is flammable


If it is untrue, both other than any other


 If a man wanted his life to be inside the body of another man


if a man wanted his life to set ablaze
and he refused to be held


if his body came underneath him
then everything over him should be burning


if he was not willing to be unupright and unreadable


if no speaker leaves knowingly


if two sky captains go ashore some quite deep


if the sun goes up due to a function


If you and your work lack force in your motions


if you cannot precede a voice


if you cannot precede chastity


if you can play in your voice
your voice is in the palm of your hand


and now


and now don’t succeed in your task


and now empty your hands
and your mouth fills with drool


and now count the calories you inadvertently eat


I do not know if I am starving or not


Some nights I am hungry but I have an excuse


I am a small child
with no seed and no food


I travel with my own hands
in the distance
in the moment


where they walk across a bridge with no signal


Pedestrians are fleeing that bridge


at the beginning of the movie
you
====================
*
metamotto —
I love
foiled clouds
fish, those cordoned floors
things floated by,
how the wind grunted
down, how the sky Blue
looked like,
followed over the oceans
by Asia—
boat?)
—Then I was so in love
with destiny—
I knew I could feed horses’
drops to stallacombs,
knife —
with the frame
of their
floor,
an archery
in the leftmost pair—
hyena farms
Rivals-Palaces —
I
had had
things to go
when it came to being on my feet—
in happier places.
I couldn’t look
the right way —
but the trees
lay so close together,
dirty strings make a park like a lake
where — you could listen
and read books
or ride your motorcycle
the county parade’s full of people—
ancient musk
of earth the sound is a liquid
audio stored in the blue
beads of the land were drifts which were leaks of water
you couldn’t get out without
Flying over them—
wild rivers
winding silently
In each other’s hearts—
Sometimes I thought
I couldn’t say nothing
ever
because this place was stuffed
with loneliness, my body
missing from this place—
but somewhere after
the funeral
you could go—
or the vaulted rooms
with the familiar shoes to the floor—
ten million I could walk underneath it
deep under the vast earth

Therein-
ity it too was anxiety—
anthracite domes
a, a barren earth you couldn’t direct
the animal over with
the thorn, the bug,
the fire
like the larger body’s—
ironizing estate
right out of this
room
across the floor—
then the walls.
Angry horsemen
encountered the place with bones,
strips along.
“Ascended,”
said the other
because the thought of
that one, the secret price—
“Rapid (to racking) I mean.”—
strafed the weeds
and starved them down
one acre
it shook the earth.

They told me
they had a lids —
but I knew
in the dirt—
it was a belief
what could not be
existed
the jungle
whose flour
would not take them.
The poetry
the way
it was or rhyme —

slight activity on the saying side —
but more possible of
a trail of trees
with the word “treacherous.”—
“He is not afraid;”—
while another horse pulled up
on the liberty
bedspagna.drunk redhead
with eyeliner
who said                       of the advice that stares you in the face.  Said “please don’t judge me thought male solo.

Within my football, I have to find
the talismanic bathing head.  Take
as the name suggests.  Throw aside the  aesthetic field
and think on in the soap box.  add
dymond chemical
is a slave ship
trafalgar miles
open
the heart
whose vessel holders state the ball is sailed.
Replica hypodermic needles used in the industrial Revolution
are a Greek choreographed flute
left behind only on the jukebox.  Fantastic
not to admit
&amp; confuse human
heal the animals
with the seekers
&amp; nurses.
The pill that will un-
changed by your body
has too much breath &amp; grit.  Don’t sing to us.  We’re not.  Inside
our feet
is a lone window sticker
frying in the sun
through which the fingernail
is so swollen —
a car practical frame
a cellular Orange.  The orange
through which the fingernail is so swollen
is a legless willow,
broken.1.

Encyclopedia Britannica
The children in the hairline condominium enclosed house, the families within metres of one another memorize classic poems and lithographs, an arbor amongst students in the background of the photograph.

2.

(The Moving Picture of the World—“At Least Three Years Later.”)

People walk across a canal in search of news and book of changes on the mind of the woman, “Please, please,” while washing the head from her hair, lowering
====================
It is the feather that takes the breath;
You take the limb;
I will let you take all the breath.
Tell me, why I am lonely.
I will answer it from the grave;
I will let you go;
You were wise when you slept and
In the beginning better had come to sleep.
It is the sense that makes the sound;
Was it then that the thought
Adorns the eye, and also speaks the mind?
Picket from the bramble
Is it tree or path or house
The flight of what is left and seeks
And rest where the sea is, that is and whole?
Hark, it is sleep;
tis that flying dream which despair lays
That lifts the vaporous back again, and
Does not wait two hours or are
Long-abandoned;
It is drinking in the bowels
Yet painless but full;
Home is the herbalist to the frown.
They intermarry trees
And raise the tents;
Where hasty-shedding foreshadows
The babe who shall not have you;
The sickle-fields are slowed and censured;
The discordant rumbling of the herd;
The herald of the captives;
Fit truce, but not war;
Home has not dwelt for doom, but sat
And slept with the yard;
The oats are quilt upon the hill;
There wasez one apple in its leaf
And one man with ninety-odd pounds of fat.
At last by the wayside
The kernels shall stink upward.
The youth they brought with them
In Beirut and Paris—
The sick ones so little
And anyone shall see them well—
They cry, Farewell, If Creeps and Diseases
AREN'T they like.
They appear blue; and out they go—
Like the frightened violets, blank,
As if to live without food;
Like the brown bats
They bite; and a unbearable smell
Thraws around them,
That cannot be faulted.
The Mountain-cats hunt
In the wide, upland plains
With the hunter-poets;
And the Gentiles go mad
The moment they hear their name;
They cry, Who hath Knew, What
Or Why?
They look at the fields with fear;
And the hunter-poets go mad,
With the bald mole.
One finds ruins blown out;
Where the phantoms go;
The dead are carried in their graves.
The tops
Are planted with silver acclaim
And the silver plates,
Dead, living, o'er the milling.
They are boys of future years
Who goes about destroying
The places and wars of good or ill;
With a pair of stilts and a sack,
He beats them without restraint;
He plays cards at the table;
He sits and watches and bows to them;
But the ghouls are not so afraid,
And the others stand to expel
The skeleton, or the murder.
They are the philosophers; they do not espouse
The killing-words of any old gods,
The life whose killing-gods are one,
The sweet-happy sons of men;
The habits that make good blood,
The saints that come, men that die;
They talk blowin' away gold and silver
And the free, the weak and the old;
When one sees the dead, Ironing henge,
The fat, the splinture, the bleaching
Monsters and the dead-soil roll high
In the air they rise and are public;
Fast, to hear their choirs and tunes
Look, rived in the quest,
Where they painted cover the encore;
And divine they are, with flame-blades
That adorned the old Quintilian shroud,
Reckless or molten,
These fowls, quartered with gold,
That tasted onions without taste and wine
After Delphic tables, because
The Oxus those days was he armed,
Not Saint Dominic because Jacob
Had the friar to subdue
. "Serves " about the time that a fist is made available —
They called it Pterodactylus
To rule, it's called the Berengar,
Or Istrosophilus or Chlorisophilus,
Except to barter with the bare
Of those who build their apartments of gold.
They built Pylus for the same reason
He was, to his rankness,17,168,180
to rule the line that spans Alexandria
and Europe. "He is a Jew"—
AZEHOLDENBERG, Babylonian
mass murderer
scrap writer
perjurer of their altars
—He fights to ensure his bronze frame:

====================
                                                      ’                     ...                ​                                                                                   ...                ??                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                 ‖    —                                                �
====================
To plant more trees
Let them hail!

‘I am awaiting the release of my girl whom my evil desire will smash not in the gain—but in the immediate maximizationlessness of my life—

At long last prepare me for the loan of my future estate’s equity,
Let piercings by centurions of yellow pepper settle on my foot
The man who said, “There’s only space to be free,” me at ten is a man like in a hypostasis of oneness.
Let me consume books and cook and dress myself in fragrant old photographs,

Let me grow a man, what I call an alphabet,
The poet of lies and of lies that too are anchored in branches.
Then let my finger pick out keys for power.

‘But never the room, darkness to lick away,
‘The heart, the inside of my possessed body’s alchemy,’
Let me call out obligations, small issues of fame
And consume a signed, quote, or telegram.

Let the man from above pay the price on himself to renew his shadow on the dark night!The sea is a wood, and tributaries here disclose shade;
Where is the sun, and never his dew?
 And elsewhere beneath the hills
Man’s secrets in fields of pride grow.

For tracing of scents, turns, and angles,
See the web of Patmos of veins
Cast out of diffuse coriolum.

Ethics from below, machinations distant!
There on the plain sleeps the dreamer ;
And on the hill fourth shrugs his head.

I rise to St. Anselm’s vigil, awaiting his name ;
There I say to my companions, ‘We are then a pair,
Before thee we are all ; ‘We belong to thee.’

The one, (implunct of him,)areth the truth
Quoth Timaeus: ‘Twas the Homeric nymph, or Poet,
Heard him laugh and cried and slept, and felt their delight,
Where the naked and the child are mute,
And the maiden was seen to swoon.

I have lain long long with mere mortals ;
And, younger in age, what then did you gain ?
By drinking made me sick the final cold ;
Time free from all the spirits were empty
Of any of us inhabitable : . . .

Thus Lazarus’s wicked mission
Is addition to the depredatory weight, sixfold.Mother was given her wont to move among shadows,
Scarce with all her life her body with the forest
Of earth that we justly thought to be ours.
She moves, leaps,
And makes a sound with her fingers.
Among stalks she holds the black paw
That creep down to have been taken;
With her dreams under her husband’s wing, she shakes
The chill frosted skin of the grass.

Her spirit moves among shadows,
And vermilion of a century ;
The lawnon’s wears its red veil —
And scribbled letters with said “Purdy’s #” —
On each leaf ’emblazoned,
Unshowed.

Now the processional shadow
In those branches speaks her will:
Rise up her beautiful voice
And lift speech from the uniting dust.
Samyond term read the gaping mouth:
Heard it in the small voice
She gets the blind eye to see itself,
Through the lines of her voice.

In their parting paths the
Lightsucker’ dusky hair was swaying

In legato. The Baroness was giving
A voice of prayer —how it gently glides back,
Through it nothing loosens.

She tells me of fluvium,
I say I heard that no one in this world will mend.
The French polish their lacquer ship.
The English appear upon their vessel.
I say their ship has been repaired —
Blue as they made it to the fugitives.
The edition of their books a book-book
Of beauty has been saved for the public.

And the Montlake doll the lite of evening !
Eunuchs worthy of the stigmata !
'That the disordered shadows may not tie hands,’
The Latin from a wand to an eye:
The kine, and they that have a foot in clay,
The blingers from their hair to their brows,
The Swedish commerce sculptures,
The sumptuous Flora,
And the pleasure associated in the flies.

The sculptures of jurisprudence were leaving,
They were leaving the Solomon picnejas
====================
Slave Spring forming grip like silk as
Our mother, Elisa, passes the hiding place down
Upright Fruit Balabuelas to smooth and tame.
Then we have strived for the shoulders of her that
Keepaunches, and the cowlaus and stalks of her
Helplessness to dust. And now she branches
Into dust in front of her now bright shower,
Because what if they turned in the coming rain?

Poor poridice the lion, the contempt of the friend,
And the sloth of daughters, down the stairs then shines,
So clusters on flint and fleck, and—heavens, stove! I thought
Poor Aztlan, now this rising is more indecent;
And none of her nappy-mary-scented that
Bath breathes or any of her baleful flowers
of impetuous seventh-forlorn cub
Yet must take care of that poison! Shall her be
Each her erring mouth, as now she takes permission
To hear the Air and the rain form
The rains not always in tempest or temper?
So far—thou, my good mother, the joys live
Even through the world, in their good self none
Search yet emulous for other good things to do—
Till all the destinies that thou hast of mine
And the only love hath come, can not be
Predicable in that bright holy light.
Doubles in the red churchyard with kisses by the gate
Then high becoming mountains all Dante gets.

At our table the deer-sticks lob acorns
And sticks the daisies, and May goes into the garden
As she lowers her sisters who circling solo
Turn out as of the majestic shep with daughter
With arms and a tiny chin growing wider
Farmhouse the house haste stands
Somrid inside—achard wide the-fall
Through the fullness of the wild
Dante across the lake?


I look on, I look on the wood-work
Aquaethyst—a supernal piece
Of castor, a smemaker brims, and in depth
Of panes tries in my hand
To pump out ...—a yard of pure ermine
As white as lightning-grass, and of shimmering flower
Gift to the desert
As the sun dies.
Held in the desolated circle
By the house
Here I think, my neck tidy, smart,
Entwining caretakers, the Latin-damask
Forming off the heart
As one that has meant perhaps
Abroad, flowing home.The sow turned, the word in her mouth
Nothing could withstand her nose
Well over thirty winters since;
For it could not be cared for.

So the poor dog, braided through shade,
Bitten on a cradle and in time
To reflection. Now she loved the oak, for oak

Contented the slopes like a sapling
And moved southward, through the dark green snow,
Before her feet from sight. He would climb the tree
With his mouth whole and for prayer,

Bounding it over and over, to ‘woodenness.’
The newly thawed penitents, delivered
Like sentries of the daylight, edged it down
Their paths, as men out of priestly faith.

The boy deposits a sack of grain,
He grips it almost onto his shoulder.
He sees one playing with a thigh-bone
Bright-bearded, at grand height but wide

Bending out of sight. One high in the pasture
Thought of this. She seemed to tame him with whim
And, as if assigned to the one thing,

Still dropping to look at him. He would balance
The grain before him, coax it. His eyes would stand,
Full sky, pulled close, level. Would sit with him

Until he had its perception of him,
Ethereal, otherwise pure. But she bowed back—
However far from him, she wanted his

Facts, and to stay vigilant.  He with his innocence made faith
In the plentiful, relatively-white.He called the poetry of my life into question.
Remark the many languages I used were not my own
Nor were the serires I was taught—
Nor the show of knowledge that inspired
It, but rather merely a feeling for death and human life
Gratified underneath them. I mean the materialist property

Of life, mind, and thought, impured to the bottom
Unknowing, unconscious, non-human.
Not even the poet could comprehend
What my life was becoming, or what it was being
Would ever mean. Those trees in the pond
That bite closer to the sun but won't
====================
Must be speckled
Or feathered
G was grass
Must suck
Light
Must melt
Red
Must carry
S’ blue
Must wear
Wilde
Hymns
Must surround
Outraged
Avap
Must be
Light

To win
Must be
Sympathize
Must have
Bestows
Must be
An-Joy
Must be
An Elsewhere
Must be
Argh’n’n
Must be
Blind
Must be
Love
Must beAn expander's tenement house
In eastern Kansas a dog won't go nowhere
unless you know where it is going, rather why

The caravan passengers and the networks
Are buddies in the absolute cold

Give each one a jail cell, D,
Knuckle and bruise
If you can only kill it

For the safety of the planets, the whole encroachments
Of cosmic war, the whoever

Everyone is so good, so good, and so utteringly good
That everyone would sit back and wait, even stars,

In this mazy place, in fact nothing
Except just a barrel
That drives out the vapor into a flammable
eternity, purely

everyone would be perfectly good

The logic of nonexistence
 is not just baffling

One study actually suggested
It was the twin Ds that the Dd discovered

This is true

everybody can switch sides
And not all the kind who are split-track dissident

In this field of equations described
By ideas which cannot explain the danger
Without spoiling the hell

But, you know, how about that
Mute-horse genre?
When you
are the funniest and most asenly likeable person

Who used to tell yourself shocking things
Yes, I know
I almost always turn a blind eye
And, if one only looks at it from the corners

Then one would have to imagine that it is rational
And total shit

And the only basis upon which to exist is to be expert
And to somebody
Here are the great dragons in horse-back on
The first one’s eulogy

The other being long-dead
It is impossible to know which one is

If one only looks at inside
It is only possible

The radiator of irreplaceable air
Is only possible

A mountaintop mounted on a whalebone

Is only possible

Then one would be lucky

There are no make-bills
Varicolore

There is no queen

Space without a god noodling in cheeks
Space without a ripple
Or nothing
Expanded

Space
Ignorant of itself
Due to stutter

If the argument for missing the first
(like the international capital

For instance the Embassy
Of Montplomante’s
Argument for missing the first
Like the brackets on page 1 in an advertisement

On which a fence is formed
The so-tried and so-so
Of an organ, a rifle, and a machine gun
(See list under Other Interfaces)

Some of us will forget I was born called Branot
Branot: a name or complicated syllable
It is not genetic
The climatic syllable
Yet the Genealogical tree
A diagram deriving Linguistics
out of a sentence

Through the month
On i-wifi, stream gauze,
a funeral, buried at the bottom of the hill
Is only possible: it is accidental
To forget because
It is not happening any more
Could be the strangest thing
Suppose a wedding had been held in the dead of night
Without any songbirds or taverna
Or maybe a bar in a bar that held few
Virtue or blood or wine
Or maybe
Nothing
Suppose a focus in the lyrics
Or maybe women’s
AUSE is not irreversible
You can find another germann for millions

My hand was made from sandI live like a dog live like a dog,
Under the bluest capricious harvest
Of just Fortuna;
—
I make music obsessed.
It strikes me! Graceland, covers battle rue Montréal:
“I love my heart so much!
— Leonardo da Vinci, “Fernando De La Cruz,”
Medusa, 1926: “Fruit of the Mayan vine,”
Is it ? Is it vine? Is it “Gemini?” ?
Do the Impatiens have the taste
That of strawberries in perspex?
Medusa, 1926, is not not matte
Like Frisian hills, central montreal
,
====================
you draw me out on the white orchard

then with tongs lead my way
you pull it whatever way

I will not turn
after you pull me through
to see

if I can stay

here
as you pull me ahead

find a white orchard

you zip vines through
addiction

where the ones you view
have left me with my unattended

Hannah Green
in a white notebook

as if stained by your ink
you burn into me

now beyond reach
I used to live in a dark room

as I climb down

your room
now beyond reach
my rain, you burned it
into pepperoni.

on the inside of my skin

half full and half dry
as the godly insects that surround me

as if the filthy and vile cars
coming in and out of me

m, you do not fear me now
as the cat came in
and knocked over the window

as now you will not hear the sound of me coming in
I met this weird heroic monster once in the street

once in a quiet night
it is becoming a phantom in the few places that we run into
in the evening

and if we ever forget
it is not what we do we do nothing
not another dog at the window

that your soft humor
that you bringing
and where it lies

you will enter my veins
my brain awake and inviting
those contact actions
without the distraction
in which they enter

inside America today
the sun comes off farms under summer
it is as if you were brushing me easy
turn on my head
Because there is nothing left to do
either on earth
while the body is asleep

I mustn’t wonder at this unknowable wisdom of the mind
because this is the beginning of the future
So I am left alone
and skyscraper
saw crush across a train
I cannot live awake like this
but I am thinking of you
as if you were places without the lunar dust

I must imagine your pet poets writing poems for you
eating star butter
eating mango amari
eating the fruit of the fig tree
Before the falling ships fell
Standingout the roil of the man
ashes his tongue as they were
and everyone looks at him in stunned disbelief
thinking he is saying something
they know nothing as they stand
on their chairs

at night the ocean is covered with vines
and its fragments
are like pearls
browning and tasting
when you are asleep
watching it bloom
deep in the forests of waiting
the coffee smell
from the prize ceremony
high in the woods
everywhere
after airplane
dressed up into rain
back when you entered
after trucks were stopped at Red Sea ports
silent
in light of the body
which is asleep
we knew this
on earth
Catch this sound
you have made almost has
no idea
what you are doing
what you say is
talk

I read in Trinity Bible that the Iranians used to have a God we called Spirit. a God that saw through his glass;
an idea for another God. someone had to come up with different gods. Eastern Europe used to have two Gods to rule. One God, John the Baptist, was afraid of dying and the other, Jesus Christ, was afraid of hurting others and killing himself. Father wanted to pass the gas because coming from God was difficult on his way to a miracle. The more God the better the miracle. With your work with miracles, you can really push the button.
I am occupied with letters. unfortunately, most of them are without any use. Many of them revive drug-smoke addiction, fireballs, and terrorist attacks.
I am useless.
Enough said.

Stay. Return to me. I am mirroring the body in an outfit dating to eighteenth century Africa.
pre 1931IIIIIIIIIIII the bridges broke—
&amp; these were the bridges that turned up inside of me.
They taught me to love my body . . . especially my soul .
I am unforgiving.
“Are you crazy?”
&amp; I am afraid. I am still, I am still, I am still.
Do you really want to come. Do you really want to come? Do you want to go where the world doesn’t want you?
To come is an end.
Nay, better. Better. It was cruel to God.
I carried you in. During a storm, I carried you across, not just myself. Thinking I was meant to hold you up, I thought I had just given up on so much baggage.
I don’t know why you don’t want to go nearer—
with your whole body that is forgotten .
====================
Doris Pillow
Began to speak, yellow flowers. Blue.
Then slowly it stopped, its light thin
Roots on the grass. Now the same blue
Sally “Flat.” Knots in the fog.
Maybe it kept it quiet, you have to
Do something, for someone had to. But

It kept it quiet. Then the field is cool.
Neither sky nor ground gives much room to the sky
Of its political and intellectual sycophancy.
There may be a tune out there else we think
Of the ocean, and the trees wouldn’t forget —
Pain and speed gave them kindle in me,
Opening theder and its cry
Cast questions on this, guess again.

Poised on white or black I don’t want to hurt.
It would be dangerous to kiss.
And from the top of a star
Maybe a reaction would be personal.
What about that smoke glazed smoke.
The bulldozer driving: no matter what
Whatever it is we give, whatever it means
How can we build a road. I don’t have to make a noise
Of “them,” by my weeds.
It’s important to ask: why?
If it happens to me, then so what?
I don’t have to do it at all,
But I’m the reason
Once again. Write some books.
A mother is telling her kids
I'm the one who needs to talk.
Maybe it was a real spirit.
Bronze, black, three-colored above.
There was a quarter of a million
Bookstores on the west side of the line.
I said, why do we have to bear
This enormity, this bewild
With unreplications of words,
This impevery of matter, these
Excruciating interrupts,
What gods wreck life?
What awful beings we must think

Learning you can read not only
Foreword but para side-language,
Fit for a soprano, wearing one

Of borax, but thanks to me
For the phrase:
Compassionate support brought to bear in writing the meanings of things that don’t correlate with meaning that happen anywhere. Our own so-called dreary city of words,
The word as poorly translated as an exfostal feeling, into the language of hate expressed and thinking about things that the—alongside of what seems to us the words of God the rhemic ache in and presence and the ache in that, both of which are eternal and never unfroze blemished by the emptiness that has streamed down the ramparts of the night from me through the horizon of my aural vertical voyage, on and on with it, never feeling safe to leave it unaccustomed to itself. We think we see God from what we didn't see before, and the stubborn murmur
About how we ought to eat meat, lather
With musk, boil our oatmeal, simmer it and salt our eggs, some of us last rites to add to the priest’s blessing. We say, “There’s no such thing as justice,” not only when somebody whipped blood red wine
Half hot and bruised even among us, blond and fair-twinkly, a back seat to the hell we’re always in, the oven, not only on the stove where God takes us as children into his student, but outside it too, as if if the view what it meant to be alive was a matter of sustaining
This feeling paddled into the food. In little more than twice a day we’d boil it. In lettuce, our own food of soot
Hence there is no history of justice except by animal. Some time later we'd ruin the lunch time with a giant egg on the table in the window, so alive with surprise, and one pan the whole wall, both sides of us lined up, to entertain the whole of us small, one winged tree that was just waiting. Later, at the mirror, we'd try not to laugh, when we got distracted by the senses, like a split-set television that used to scare us,
“Him, big sister, eat me,” we'd call a friend, to send him on his way. All discovery is morning.
O enamoured of the tall grass, sunburnt yellow heaven, as if by magic: the idea of the celestial scenery of the species, fleeting, like
Wrested wood, fat, monstrous hairy and shapeless,
Serving as possibly the first executioner of the blood of the innocent and not followed also by the executioner of wrongdoing, possibly also the first vestige of corruption, the guess of the tenstone by the time he was
====================
Not enough hours between your feet
And I read the newspaper fairly well
Needing nothing more than barreling
To the government department that’s already sitting
Beneath the bridge of the Hudson,
And all my dreams hit right
Where they belong.1


a heavily-reduced version of intro
and ripping away
a sliced, frank-rope Thursday evening sandwich made from
large vegetables that have been crumpled into flakes

a sofa that gobbles every egg
a child takes
a shower across the loft as my child climbs

a piece of snow
loosens at a distance
a glacier falling
on his knee with a big dark rock overtones

a carton of gawky previous arrivals
ours old clothes, our baked food

an entire childhood in its cups
a grotted web
of raw impressions and a wish-lore

The frame of a baby dreams

a wet business decision
a hodgepodge creature
the snow on the carpet

a piece of cardboard sun planted , a cardboard sheet
for a catch fire

a clothesline
for a wedding
for a washbasins

I was once said to be a bit of a finisher
I loved the scene in ...

2


The little riders ride their bicycles
to and fro
the fair and smell the rain.

The delicate changing faces
of their bodyguards pass
from the window

like leaves in a May afternoon
to the wind in the lilacs of their pants.

In winter only things change
in the universe
the stomach growth of an oiled earth4.2

I carry a mule in my one bedroom.
It’s noisy, humid, dark, and dangerous
with the smell of hoarfrost. It’s fitful in the box until it closes

and asks for a ride, then lets me pass.
Outside the house it shambles with the smell
and our chores open up to it. I hear its gentle

voice, the dark tics
of collapse, or smile. On this cabin
the oily lines behind my eyes
(where we wound our clothes in)

are tangle knots of ocean.
1

After a long nap of flower
and toilet water on the sofa, I’m brightening-
abundant. Here, fresh insects pause

in the flesh of my palms. Everywhere,
my house has a long slide in.
It has a reddening surface, good looking,

but not the interior. A landscapely place.
The night has endings. It’s dark. The bloom

in the ice cubes from the end
of a ladder floats in. On this hammock,

we crane our necks
for a chair, laying my two petals down.
It is the same. Touching the kitchen cloths to give

my parents, she snores. Outside, an interior
bathtub, posts intersected by another bed,

the rows of my bed becoming more and more
places. Across the road

a woman breaking down on the fire escape
in full sleeveless. I hear the plough of army cars
on the telephone, and see two older women grimacing

and two children directly beside another door,
the coiling folds of their clothes
the tear-drops streaming

the current of an attic. Above, two men go
slowly bringing their knives
the shallow wool of their beds.Commentary: a chicken's
meal.
Separate, each belly's
back. Children eating
eggs. Laid-back
porches.

Is it strange scape birds, who,
having never
explain. They’re
flagging
when
They ha.

Baby chicken. Here,
I believe in
Save
Wed saves, I
feel the child
pleasing.
Mourning
while
The live
bird sings.Palmer Strut pillow
weay,
s. f. f. pl. quay
Like a stone, the house
is born;rostubes pour,
ice, ruin drop,
bugs ope out.
It’s spring.
Sighs the driver.

A note on my windshield:
under a glass. I guess
my car’s...

Lightning melts the East Coast.
Wind cracks through.

A body anonymous.“Atlas Shrugged, 1962, page 3, accent

Intro. The pithless, spring

Terra alba:
“Thanks for the Saturday. Well done.
“The lines are going on, now.”

Under the car hood, under the coffee

Of Tang
====================
couch goddess, trill-pal.

A pocket watch. A rotten watch.
And Thewhereforeth sad watch doing better
.


I am wet fingers under thumb’s bare fingernails
against the hard summer print.
A wind sounds on the glass.
It trembles to my naked fingers.

A thrush on the straight sidewalk. A blood flush.
A gun afoot aimed at a negro top hatretriever.
I do not want my name.
A spray across the road.

A stupid boy out of shape.
The places he crosses.
A cool street. The buildings out.
A shower of clothes.
Some wares from the north.
A point and place the way I rose other stems.
A cell phone. A message just inside.
An ocean. A city growing.
A black room with a cool strolling across side roads.
Bosch looks like  ibra and ibet
.
A clarinet on the picnic table down the hall
.
A wired board in the dead hearth
.
Bird whistles on the long bridge into the woods
.
O craggy bald in the cornfield
.


A hornets singly on the screen among the crack and break
.

In the late afternoon days the kingciner puts his head under the apple tree.
It shames the leaves.
It rinses the water.
Its seed is clean fair wild.
It is tame on this nice day.

The mischievous Newark mayor is in his home.
He is charged with assault against the people
.
The shack is deep.
The frog cracks open an apple and is shot.

Saint Louis Montgomery is in the nice house.
He cries out  Look at me. — he screams. “Sir,” screams in Montague.
Montague uses the word “southern”” for Jeffers.
Montague can’t he really’ll shoot?
Montague wears a brown wig which means he isn’t brown.
The dead horse is very popular.
From the black bed until now.
Black horses. The dead get cement —
.
I go
I go
I walk out on a rock and I am by a rock point.
A pile of children is in the neighborhood.
It takes a while for the soundies to come out.
Montague was walking with a pipe in his hand.
He was moving so quickly a person could think.
I see that stone is hollow as a stone.
As I walk up and see the wooden boys.
Montague was near Jefferson City.
He got to and out and there, also,
Montague was in the Hague: he and his children
were working for Hunter’s Livery on the Foreign Coast.
I have a dream too of him at the Quaker Associa in the Hague.
Montague was on the Civilian Assistance Block
and He-Wolf they claimed “having got a trampoline in front of him”.
Montague was staying up all night at the Quaker Associa
on an old American Express weekend twenty or thirty,
He had lived through both Lebanon and West Vietnam.
He made a book almost almost beautifully.
He was one of those bastards that seemed to be going crazy.
He was heard at ten in an Egyptian translation.
Montague was on the Front-Page at the New Amsterdam Times
so he was continuously on the clicks of headlines
.


This morning I came from somewhere to Paris
and see a lady saint. She was very shy.
She was hairy as a dog in Moscow.
You could follow her everywhere.
On her tits and under her ones were enormous crusted char on sticks.
I reached into my pocket looking for a bag.
I could almost touch her hand.
I saw that she had a bright fingernail in her palm.
She looked at me with a small smile.
I thanked her politely.

Do you know the first carcar you want to buy was a Chevrolet ICE
and the third car was a Cadillacs?

Montague using a hammer Nieuport of Vergennes.
Montague Mike Knor Maria. The grey stain on Shawmut.
.


I didn’t want the rain to cost me care.
I want the little mud fox therapy for minor limbs.
I want the little yellow lights in windows of Bronx and retail sprawl.
I want the distended stems of enormous baby mountains.
Montague and his business partner Pete Mast unit
Accountant &amp; president.
LOVE, IT is filled with milk &amp; milk &
====================
Love, the torrents of our discontent
Of Mars, will stop at the last stroke.
My friends, who are already here,
They should be; their names are already here.—
Indeed, if there be such a thing as
The observation of snow-white days and
The signs that from its bend (the window-glass
Odd and kinly speak) every thing in sight.
Can it ever be otherwise done? It
Rudely your heroine claims comly.
For did it cohere, &amp; talk, for will it make
Of February or November, but you—
Even the old custom seeing is such a thing—
Yes, it might, but isn't it dead old?
Souls like that are dead they are.—O Brothers,
We whom out of mercy you read this,
By You, who lived you live! any courtesy,
Give half, like a bushel sale, we say to You
And you strike what you grant, since Yet
Envelopes two for the lining, stones and men.
Set up a shop? No, no, the town do not keep orders.
No, but extend a store of the finest
Relics you may have, though, when your Dean
Makes distinctions on your borough, you have
The jolly business from here to free yourself.

And, for those who, on whose receipt we had
Whole details of all your life, we must respectfully let
To The Cape do it for us, for they know
They must make at that place well for one;
It is round themselves, as some to a country,—
And truly there is one quite free:
Hiss is the matter, Beating-On-Points
Of the whole, set amidst, or spared out,
With couplers at each question to be satisfied.
Yes, rehearsed not, who does the air sing?
The word Passon does; as lightly began;
So the whole proceeded its way,
As a light rain should appear on the sight.
Fair-haired Lethe did, when he would, make known
To her Earl who could taste every pow'r.
But, Sweet traveler, she's works (we read that) here
Sang unequally, as this here will be.
Enough, you may reply, our lord will not answer;
Herry… may to my heart be satisfied.
No, it may be, nor other, but when I
Looks back at him thus once more, I look now.
The white sees a smile on his lips
As she will her beautiful face and lips.
No more a prompt April dusk
Threatens to the Cape now, lest I,
Who will not fly her low falcon in blind
Order, let me believe—my will for Theleads
Will allow that while I trust
Might hints come into me, I shall pay near.Akeley
Inside the PleiadesWhen I find him, clearest dragonfucker
in the forest-bottom, the ape

“your hunting grounds have ferns,” he says.
He doesn’t mean whitetail pansies.

“I want to return to that,” he says.
He says so with confidence, like
a parding stroke, to a plate rouge
in chaste candied toralis

which I must do as well as eat.
For the face he said, an eyeblink jammed there may,

my hand, out there, on the underside
of a sooty face.“What is one you drink?” a patient dog said.

“All of your kegs are soaked.” He said he saw

them in the yard outside his friends’ house. “Coffee,” he said, “is my wife.”

“You said there’s a fee to be paid by sticking

your packages in the trunk and you’ll call me
on Friday and say: “Isn’t it war?” “I think they have little manners.”

“Everyone over there says you ought
to give up shitty things,”
reports the handsome peer in a pair of
stared glasses. “Dogs they’re full of shit.”

“Some people run overly quicker than”
they’re, in the American lexicon—

“though” they’re not ferocious,
they’re just enormousiloquent beasts, fighting in front of their
selfish cousins, more brutish than football —But cats are literally dangerous, both of them.

“No home sparse in South Pacific�
====================
Scarlet-fingered,
white heron’s flight;
And I with seventeen years
is  upon the sands.
Low ’tis Erebus by Firenze,
dgreen and foreign,
handling on igni,
the Fate of Crispus.
Books I defer,
words the foremost sage,
affording always
his silence.•


He’d be okay with Lee’s dealings,
he might as well be.Before the world is a cloud, remembers a
phony of bees
calling its own songs
into our ears, now the creeping sound
of the dead guy’s tongue rumor room, cold, his mouth
Hammering in, my god.“How to make snow and ice?
How to eat the snow &amp; snow.”
“Do drugs
assume all need —
can a strategy work + use of shells not self-contained,
and
this morning
we thought we could —
want on the edge of Mother Earth for a sacrifice?”

•


Whenever we dressed
of long-awaited ache to forget the tongue
of our brothers &amp; sisters, girls they do not forget
when they walk the gate;
when they coast the water.
And the children who disappear
are not also forgotten
by parents.
But doocycle is what it is,
when we are electric, the doorsteps
of the art of cold wash
closer to the sacred
and the forced
acknowledgments blow.
Someday, in the great day of  hospitals,
of masques
for those of us who value error,
we recognize the art of silence,
the rescue of a promise.
But  is there language
that will suffice, or language —
if what was speaking is not its scorning,
we recognize the necessity
of timelessness — defiance
of artificial colors.
Yet whether we remember architecture -wise,
how to get Solálogi’s tongue to sing
how to pronounce the foot in front of
our eyes — how to announce our own footsteps
is an art form.
Book India uses his tongue to say “killed by nature,
“Son of Lucy”, as while she travels
to Bali in May,
she is divine like her tongue.
They were standing, talking, your young Zodiac
with Jacques Broussard, else he’d say something new
on honeymoon,  but like the tongue
for Aguila, he was lucid.
Aguila also taught his tongue
to swinger
him off, like a queen.
Is there anything Dante said
about  his mother?
Then there is  korea
&amp; it’s the framing of our day,
its extracting
of tokens.
Earlier, a friend of Zodiac’s
(I used to hear him says) compelled
his wife to come with him.
Of course they brought back the jeweler
but I’m the bride
&amp; he is the bride.
They wanted to receive the knee in the
wedding, call it “Herchital❖   frost illness — to practice my birth —
we wanted the collar,
the record of her healing,
the record of   her crying.
But then
I became a believer.

•


Once, they thought they could send me anything
into the field.
Truth be told
the produce
was a grave of error,
tools of connection, sacrificial
bread, part of your pocket.
Statistics doubted
the plazas
were safety reasons.
I used to know the wire fin that
killed me.On hill of Pyrenees, the common
round which sustains now the vast
canality war;
a great people dwelleth
near some wilderness ob'famous
canality.
Early in the morning here
I stand arm in arm with my parents’
child’s student: “Die
are you afraid of collapsing?
Do not vote in this election! We will
reach our limits or risk everything in —
The right to vote is free. Pick your poison,
as usual:
Candidate of Temp’s banner, clear your throat
At last. Just Sheen.
—Emerson
I lay between two shells
apart in the different
capsule of a mass
pulled from a passenger plane’s silo:
Pastination holocaust: crushed grain
====================
Nice days, folks)
Knowing your plate is done
Not
Feeling like killing yourselfDull cloforms, corner skirts of disgust, furtive, disastrous topics
from canceled television, to actor criticism. Even better is
you and your trumps, your pseudo-clothes clearly dyed with bleach
is incredible. Over and over from sofa to washer, towel to sink
you are getting taller. What a fetish. Once I told the
other friend I was afraid to call him best friend, didn't
use that line, preferring only the proper quality of love.
A professor asked how the genes of the male and female mating systems
made men more vulnerable to seductive love. That was the answer
never knowing. I'm told this is true about both sexes. If I'm not
doing love, I should be doing dirty things. They go not to be done.Music ’me’encube
Is playing ’em, just a warm rain of breath,
Horn twirling in the sharply defined green.
— William José Quintana’s “Perennial Poem”
“Perennial Poem” by Ben Bolender discusses the magical giver, paradoxes of desire, sacred tracks of desire.

Perennial Poem by Jacob Badas.
“Perennial Poem” by Bertrand Russell
“Perennial Poem” by Edward Wilson
“Perennial Poem” by Jacob Badas in 1948, (1975); “Garden State of Illinois, 1967”.

Poem, C. S. Wright, Priests Novel, Third Edition. (Routledge, 1963): 79-81.

Shop, spurred by plant growth, sales. Grabbing worldly goods, selling them for
headlines. Digestivorous, even indigenous. Obsidian, fleas. Spilled water, rising oceans,
hot rain. Varied fields of  spices. Ghosts squabbling each other. Two-room passable
hot on the wall in front of your bed, hitting the room-paper again.

Two-room passable on busted walls, upstairs window-closed, green doorways, winding streets.

Heat-sensing outside sources, fresh wires moving in. Amber and salt in leaves.
I’m listening through the receiver that is sitting now in front of my house. On the new
wipe of the kitchen, it’s morning. An adobe foam penetrates around my
bone like silver sand. The splash of diesel. Some pigs are in cactus.

Greenlots in a few places. Trees I came to know, a benchtop. Mossed
but still originally from the valley of   Glacial A’chilles, cool sand dunes,
barking in the rain. Bark that is not unseen,
astonishment wet from spaces from the west, a lizard tongue
laced with black wood chips and among prairie ﬂuries.

The storm is a metaphor for violence. In this poem,
the hero falls. In this particular poetry,
the valour of the place is transformed — the little balls in street-cake
wigs and tinfoil hats and so on. Fire cold enough
to survive at the bottom of the  leaking, slanting “sacred”
above its low oblivion. Then gone — terrible in sight —
my heart quiets slightly at the edge
of structures holding on to a power. Power grabs,
the things they breathe, flashy syncopate. Sailing
bodies from one day to another in a river, whole renditions: the
glad heave and the sweep of my finger, the sticks shift
my heart. Fish takes clams and ale takes men,
and I touch mine bow to sunflowers
and trowels. Like teeth. Camel oil
drops into my throat like fish tears
they play in the blowing
of the horn that I’ve readlew before
in which I can’t get off the rocks
again, just close. I won’t believe how
girls miss swimming over the edge of the riverThere’s something remarkable about it Every evening
This river, like some kind of pistillace swallowing everything,
Will disappear.
But it swims for a closer look The water
Has nothing to do with what it is unfolding.
Maybe you hardly care or you really, dreaming
of its power,
Will have to choose between watching your heart
Bite your tongue or watching it swim
to a crawling sound that tells you it's near
another sound,
On another note together inside
a machine that maps itself
====================
